Maryland, session 2025, HB0351.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2025 in the total principal amount of $1,814,825,000
$1,763,325,000 $1,813,932,177 $1,814,825,000. This loan shall be evidenced by the
issuance, sale, and delivery of State general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of
the Board of Public Works and issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117
through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The bonds to evidence this loan or installments of this loan may be sold as a
single issue of bonds under § 8–122 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(3) The cash proceeds of the sale of the bonds shall be paid to the Treasurer and
first shall be applied to the payment of the expenses of issuing, selling, and delivering the
bonds, unless funds for this purpose are otherwise provided, and then shall be credited on
the books of the Comptroller and expended on approval by the Board of Public Works, for
the following public purposes, including any applicable architects’ and engineers’ fees:
EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT – GOVERNOR
D25E03.02 INTERAGENCY COMMISSION ON SCHOOL
CONSTRUCTION
(A) Aging Schools Program. Provide additional grants for capital
improvements, repairs, and deferred maintenance work at
existing public school buildings. Grants shall be distributed to
local boards of education in proportion to grants received under
§ 5–324 of the Education Article (Statewide) ............................. 6,109,000
(B) Healthy School Facility Fund. Provide funds to public primary
and secondary schools in the State to improve the health of
– 5 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
school facilities. Grants shall be administered in accordance
with § 5–322 of the Education Article. Further provided that
funds shall be administered by the Interagency Commission on
School Construction (Statewide) ................................................. 90,000,000
(C) Public School Construction Program. Provide funds to
construct public school buildings and public school capital
improvements, including providing grants to local boards of
education for federal E–rate–eligible special construction such
as fiber and broadband infrastructure projects for
E–rate–eligible applicants in accordance with Title 5, Subtitle
3 of the Education Article (Statewide) ....................................... 290,857,000
(D) Senator James E. “Ed” DeGrange Nonpublic Aging Schools
Program. Provide funds to be distributed as grants to nonpublic
schools in Maryland for expenditures eligible under the Aging
Schools Program, including school security improvements.
Provided that grants may be provided only to nonpublic schools
eligible to receive Aid to Non–Public Schools R00A03.04 (for the
purchase of textbooks or computer hardware and software for
loans to students in eligible nonpublic schools) during the
2024–2025 school year or nonpublic schools that serve students
with disabilities through the Non–Public Placement Program
R00A02.07 Subprogram 0762, excluding preschools in fiscal
2026, with a maximum amount of $100,000 and a minimum
amount of $5,000 per eligible school.
Further provided that:
(a) Unless a school serves students through the
Non–Public Placement Program, an eligible school
may apply and qualify for a grant as specified below
based on the following criteria:
(1) At least 20% of the school’s
students are eligible for free
or reduced price meal
programs;
(2) Tuition charged to students
is less than the statewide
average per pupil
expenditure for public
schools as calculated by the
Maryland State Department
of Education; and
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
(3) The school has a facility with
an average age of 50 years or
more; and
(b) If a school meets:
(1) All three of the criteria
specified above, the school
may receive up to $100,000;
(2) Two of the three criteria
specified above, the school
may receive up to $75,000;
and
(3) One of the three criteria
specified above, the school
may receive up to $25,000.
Further provided that if more eligible schools apply and qualify
for grants than the total authorizations, the Maryland State
Department of Education shall prorate the grants based on the
total authorization amount. Further provided that the funds
shall be administered by the Maryland State Department of
Education and the Interagency Commission on School
Construction. Further provided that grants made to nonpublic
schools shall be expended within 3 years of the date that
funding for the grants became available. Any funding for grants
that is unexpended following 3 years of having become
available shall be transferred to the Unreserved Statewide
Contingency Account for public school construction
(Statewide) ................................................................................... 3,500,000
(E) Supplemental Capital Grant Program for Local School
Systems. Provide funds to local school systems with enrollment
growth that over the last 5 years exceeds 150% of the statewide
average or with 250 or more relocatable classrooms. These
funds shall be administered in accordance with § 5–313 of the
Education Article and can be used for grants to local boards of
education for federal E–rate–eligible special construction such
as fiber and broadband infrastructure projects for
E–rate–eligible applicants, provided that notwithstanding
Title 5, Subtitle 3 of the Education Article, a grant awarded by
the Interagency Commission on School Construction to a
county with the highest student enrollment count in the
– 7 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2025–2026 school year shall not require a local cost–share
match (Regional) .......................................................................... 53,891,000
DA02.01 DEPARTMENT OF DISABILITIES
(Statewide)
(A) Access Maryland. Provide funds to design and construct
architectural upgrades at State–owned facilities to improve
accessibility for persons with disabilities .................................... 1,027,000
DB01 HISTORIC ST. MARY’S CITY COMMISSION
(St. Mary’s County)
(A) Visitor Center Conversion for Education and Artisan Centers.
Provide funds to begin the design of renovations and expansion
of the visitor center at 18751 Hogaboom Lane and the adjacent
storage facility to create the Education Center and Artisan
Center Complex at Historic St. Mary’s City ............................... 381,000
DE02.01 BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
GENERAL STATE FACILITIES
(Statewide)
(A) Facilities Renewal Fund. Provide funds for the repair and
rehabilitation of State–owned capital facilities .......................... 53,210,000
(B) Fuel Storage Tank System Replacement Program. Provide
funds for the demolition, repair, and rehabilitation of
State–owned fuel storage tanks and design, construction, and
equipping of replacements ........................................................... 1,500,000
JUDICIARY/MULTISERVICE CENTERS
(C) New Supreme Court of Maryland Building. Provide funds to
continue construction of a new Supreme Court of Maryland
Building in Annapolis, provided that notwithstanding Section 6
of this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this project.
Further provided that $17,030,000 of this authorization shall
be used for the design, construction, and equipping of the New
State Veterans Home in Sykesville and serve as the matching
fund requirements should Maryland receive a conditional
federal award from the Veterans Home Construction Grant
Program prior to June 1, 2026 (Anne Arundel County) ............. 51,117,000
26,117,000
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
STATE GOVERNMENT CENTER – ANNAPOLIS
(Anne Arundel County)
(D) Revolutionary War Memorial for Black Soldiers. Provide funds
to construct a new monument that honors Black Revolutionary
War Soldiers ................................................................................ 500,000
750,000
1,000,000
MILITARY DEPARTMENT
DH01.04 MILITARY DEPARTMENT OPERATIONS AND
MAINTENANCE
(A) Glen Burnie Readiness Center Renovation and Expansion.
Provide funds to continue design of renovations and an addition
to the Glen Burnie Readiness Center (Anne Arundel County) .. 176,000
(B) White Oak Readiness Center Renovation and Expansion.
Provide funds to continue design of renovations to and an
expansion of the White Oak Readiness Center (Montgomery
County) ........................................................................................ 152,000
(C) New Joint Force Headquarters at Camp Fretterd. Provide
funds to begin the design for the renovation and expansion of
the Camp Fretterd Readiness Center for the purposes of
creating a new Joint Forces Headquarters located at the Camp
Fretterd Military Reservation (Baltimore County) ................... 750,000
DP00.02 DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES
(Anne Arundel County)
(A) Crownsville Veterans Cemetery Expansion and Improvements
– Phase IV. Provide funds to continue design of an expansion of
the burial capacity at Crownsville Veterans Cemetery .............. 113,000
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
DW01.10 DIVISION OF HISTORICAL AND CULTURAL PROGRAMS
(Statewide)
(A) African American Heritage Preservation Grant Program.
Provide funds to the Maryland Historical Trust to assist in the
protection of properties with cultural and historic significance
to the African American community. The funds appropriated
– 9 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
for this purpose shall be administered in accordance with §
5A–330 of the State Finance and Procurement Article ............. 5,000,000
(B) Historic Preservation Grant Fund. Provide funds to the
Maryland Historical Trust for historic preservation and
museum assistance. The funds appropriated for this purpose
shall be administered in accordance with §§ 5A–328 and
5A–353 through 5A–359 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article ........................................................................................... 1,000,000
FB04 DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland FiRST. Provide funds to continue construction of a
statewide unified public safety radio communications
system ......................................................................................... 14,909,000
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
J00A01.05 WASHINGTON METROPOLITAN AREA TRANSIT –
CAPITAL
(Regional)
(A) Washington Metropolitan Transit Authority Upgrades. Provide
funds to construct improvements and capital maintenance to
bus and rail systems in the Washington, D.C. area .................. 167,000,000
J00D00.02 MARYLAND PORT ADMINISTRATION
(Regional)
(A) Howard Street Tunnel. Provide funds to complete construction
of improvements to the Howard Street Tunnel and related rail
infrastructure primarily to increase vertical clearance ............. 31,500,000
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
KA05 CAPITAL GRANTS AND LOANS ADMINISTRATION
(Statewide)
(A) Community Parks and Playgrounds. Provide funds for grants
to local governments to design, construct, and equip
capital–eligible park and playground improvements ................ 5,000,000
KA17.01 FISHING AND BOATING SERVICES
(Statewide)
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
(A) Oyster Restoration Program. Provide funds to design and
construct oyster habitat restoration projects ............................. 4,032,000
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
MA01 OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY
(A) Community Health Facilities Grant Program. Provide grants
to acquire, design, construct, renovate, and equip community
mental health, addiction treatment, and developmental
disabilities facilities. The funds appropriated for this purpose
shall be administered in accordance with §§ 24–601 through
24–607 of the Health – General Article and in accordance with
Code of Maryland Regulations (COMAR) 05.05.09
(Statewide) .................................................................................... 8,000,000
(B) Federally Qualified Health Centers Grant Program. Provide
grants to acquire, design, construct, renovate, and equip
buildings to be used as Federally Qualified Health Centers
(Statewide) ................................................................................... 3,500,000
(C) New Facility for Children and High Intensity Residential
Treatment Center. Provide funds to begin design of a new
Facility for Children and High Intensity Residential Treatment
Center on the campus of the Regional Institute for Children
and Adolescents – Baltimore (Baltimore City) .......................... 942,000
ML10 CLIFTON T. PERKINS HOSPITAL CENTER
(Howard County)
(A) Clifton T. Perkins Hospital Infrastructure Improvement.
Provide funds to complete replacement of the HVAC system
and other infrastructure improvements located at the Clifton
T. Perkins Hospital Center ......................................................... 12,500,000
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES
QB01.01 DIVISION OF CORRECTION
(Baltimore City)
(A) New Life Skills and Re–Entry Center for Women. Provide
funds to complete design and begin construction of a prerelease
facility for women ........................................................................ 1,000,000
2,000,000
– 11 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
QR02.03 ROXBURY CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION
(Washington County)
(A) RCI Perimeter Fence System Replacement. Provide funds to
complete design and begin construction of the replacement
perimeter fencing and security systems at Roxbury
Correctional Institution, provided that notwithstanding
Section 6 of this Act, work may commence on this project prior
to the appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this
project .......................................................................................... 9,370,000
QS02.01 DIVISION OF CORRECTION
(Anne Arundel County)
(A) Jessup Region Electrical Infrastructure Upgrade. Provide
funds to complete construction of upgrades to the electrical
infrastructure servicing correctional facilities, support
buildings, and offices in the Jessup region ................................. 4,352,000
QS02.08 EASTERN CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION
(Somerset County)
(A) ECI High Temperature Distribution and Perimeter Security
Improvements. Provide funds to complete construction of the
replacement high temperature hot water system and perimeter
security fence system at the Eastern Correctional Institution in
Westover ...................................................................................... 5,868,000
QT04 DIVISION OF PRETRIAL DETENTION
(Baltimore City)
(A) Baltimore Therapeutic Treatment Center. Provide funds to
complete design and begin construction of a therapeutic
treatment and detention center at the Baltimore City
Correctional Complex, provided that notwithstanding Section
6 of this Act, work may commence on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this project.
Further provided that $45,857,000 of this authorization shall
be used for the design, construction, and equipping of the New
State Veterans Home in Sykesville and serve as the matching
fund requirements should Maryland receive a conditional
federal award from the Veterans Home Construction Program
prior to June 1, 2026 ................................................................... 91,857,000
45,857,000
MARYLAND STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
RA11 MARYLAND STATE LIBRARY AGENCY
(Statewide)
(A) Public Library Capital Grant Program. Provide grants to
acquire land for, design, construct, and equip public library
facilities, provided that any reallocation of this authorization
or prior authorized funds for previously authorized or new
projects shall require notification to the General Assembly. The
funds appropriated for this purpose shall be administered in
accordance with § 23–509 of the Education Article ................... 7,500,000
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB21 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, BALTIMORE CAMPUS
(Baltimore City)
(A) New School of Social Work Building. Provide funds to continue
construction of a new School of Social Work building, provided
that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue
on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary
to complete this project ............................................................... 42,924,000
37,924,000
RB22 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, COLLEGE PARK CAMPUS
(Prince George’s County)
(A) Campuswide Building Systems and Infrastructure
Improvements. Provide funds to design, construct, and equip
campuswide infrastructure improvements at the College Park
campus ......................................................................................... 7,500,000
(B) Graduate Student Housing Site Development. Provide funds to
complete the construction and equipping of a graduate student
housing site development project ............................................... 5,000,000
(C) New Interdisciplinary Engineering Building – Zupnik Hall.
Provide funds to continue construction and equipping of the
interdisciplinary engineering building, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project ................................................................... 58,700,000
54,700,000
(D) New Health and Human Sciences Complex. Add funds to
continue construction of the New Health and Human Sciences
– 13 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Complex, provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act,
work may continue on this project prior to the appropriation of
all funds necessary to complete this project ............................... 2,500,000
RB23 BOWIE STATE UNIVERSITY
(Prince George’s County)
(A) New Thurgood Marshall Library and Academic Commons.
Provide funds to continue design of a new Academic Commons
and Library building ................................................................... 2,230,000
RB24 TOWSON UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore County)
(A) Smith Hall Renovation and Reconstruction. Provide funds to
continue construction and begin equipping of the partial
demolition, renovation, and reconstruction of Smith Hall for
the College of Fine Arts and Communication, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project ................................................................... 71,102,000
62,102,000
(B) Cook Library. Provide funds to design, construct, and equip
facility renewal renovations, including HVAC replacement ..... 300,000
RB25 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND EASTERN SHORE
(Somerset County)
(A) New Residence Hall. Provide funds for preliminary design to
assist with predevelopment activities for a new residence hall ... 500,000
1,000,000
RB26 FROSTBURG STATE UNIVERSITY
(Allegany County)
(A) Frostburg State University Baseball Complex. Provide funds to
design, construct, and capital equip infrastructure
improvements to the Frostburg State University Baseball
Complex including a fully artificial turf baseball field ............... 1,000,000
RB29 SALISBURY UNIVERSITY
(Wicomico County)
(A) Blackwell Hall Renovation. Provide funds to continue
construction of and equip the renovation of Blackwell Hall to
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
create a Student Services Center, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project ................................................................... 35,011,000
30,011,000
RB31 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND BALTIMORE COUNTY
(Baltimore County)
(A) Sherman Hall Renovation. Provide funds to continue
construction and equipping of the renovation of Sherman Hall,
provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may
continue on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds
necessary to complete this project .............................................. 21,211,000
(B) University of Maryland, Baltimore County Stadium. Provide
funds to design, construct, and equip a new synthetic track
surface .......................................................................................... 530,000
(C) New Student Services Building. Provide funds to begin design
of a new Student Services Building ............................................. 5,000,000
RB36 UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND OFFICE
(Baltimore City)
(A) Rita Colwell Center Deferred Maintenance. Provide funds to
complete design and continue construction of deferred
maintenance improvements, including central plant upgrades,
at the Rita Colwell Center in Baltimore City, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project .................................................................... 7,100,000
RC00 BALTIMORE CITY COMMUNITY COLLEGE
(Baltimore City)
(A) Acquisition of Unidentified Properties. Provide funds to acquire
property adjacent to the Liberty Heights campus and to design
and construct site improvements ................................................ 9,000,000
0
(B) Deferred Maintenance. Provide funds to design, construct, and
equip various infrastructure, building systems, and site
improvements .............................................................................. 9,000,000
RE01 MARYLAND SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
– 15 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(Frederick County)
(A) New Student Residences. Provide funds to complete design and
begin construction and equipping of a new high school boys’
residence and student center, high school girls’ residence,
flexible residence, satellite health center, and central offices at
the Maryland School for the Deaf in Frederick, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may commence on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project (Frederick County) .................................... 12,193,000
(B) Facilities Renewal. Provide funds to design, construct, and
capital equip facilities renewal projects at the Maryland School
for the Deaf Columbia Campus (Howard County) ...................... 750,000
RI00 MARYLAND HIGHER EDUCATION COMMISSION
(A) Community College Construction Grant Program. Provide
funds to assist the subdivisions in the acquisition of property
and in the design, construction, renovation, and equipping of
local and regional community college buildings, site
improvements, and facilities. The funds appropriated for this
purpose shall be administered in accordance with § 11–105(j)
of the Education Article, provided that notwithstanding Section
6 of this Act, work may continue on each of these projects prior
to the appropriation of all funds necessary to complete the
project .......................................................................................... 60,229,000
(1) Allegany College of Maryland –
Workforce Development and
Training Center Renovation
(Allegany County)
(2) Anne Arundel Community College –
Dragun Building Renovation (Anne
Arundel County)
(3) Anne Arundel Community College –
Florestano Building Renovation
(Anne Arundel County)
(4) Chesapeake College – Queen Anne’s
Technical Building (Queen Anne’s
County)
(5) College of Southern Maryland – La
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
Plata – Student Resource Center
(Charles County)
(6) College of Southern Maryland –
Leonardtown – A Building
Renovation and Expansion (St.
Mary’s County)
(7) Community College of Baltimore
County – Catonsville – Student
Services Center Renovation and
Expansion (Baltimore County)
(8) Community College of Baltimore
County – Essex – Primary
Switchgear and Distribution
Replacement (Baltimore County)
(9) Hagerstown Community College –
Advanced Technology Center
Renovation (Washington County)
(10) Howard Community College – New
Workforce Development and
Trades Center (Howard County)
(11) Montgomery College – New
Germantown Student Services
Center (Montgomery County)
(12) Montgomery College – Rockville
Library Renovation (Montgomery
County)
(13) Prince George’s Community College
– Marlboro Hall Renovation and
Addition (Prince George’s County)
(14) Wor–Wic Community College –
Maintenance Building Expansion
(Wicomico County)
(B) Community College Facilities Renewal Grant Program. Provide
funds to assist the community colleges with improvements,
repairs, and deferred maintenance projects. The funds shall be
administered in accordance with § 16–320 of the Education
– 17 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Article (Statewide) ....................................................................... 3,011,000
RM00 MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore City)
(A) Campus Expansion, Phase I – Lake Clifton High School
Demolition. Provide funds to complete the design and
demolition of the vacant Lake Clifton High School buildings,
remove and preserve public artwork, and stabilize the historic
valve house, provided that $50,000 of this appropriation may
not be expended until Morgan State University submits a report
to the budget committees on the redevelopment of the Lake
Clifton property. The report shall outline the progress of the
master redevelopment plan and the redevelopment scope,
identify the stakeholders, provide estimated cost and fund
sources, and provide the anticipated project timeline. This
report shall be submitted by December 15, 2025, and the budget
committees shall have 45 days from the date of the receipt of the
report to review and comment ..................................................... 6,256,000
(B) Campuswide Electric Infrastructure Upgrades. Provide funds
to continue design and begin construction of a new electrical
substation, substation upgrades, and related electrical
infrastructure components at Morgan State University,
provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may
commence on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds
necessary to complete this project ............................................... 15,000,000
(C) Deferred Maintenance and Site Improvements. Provide funds
to design, construct, and equip various infrastructure, building
system, and site improvements .................................................. 13,400,000
(D) New Science Center, Phase II. Provide funds to complete design
and continue construction of the New Science Center, provided
that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue
on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary
to complete this project ............................................................... 69,580,000
60,580,000
RQ00 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND MEDICAL SYSTEM
(A) Comprehensive Cancer Center. Provide a grant to the
University of Maryland Medical System to design, construct,
and equip facilities to expand clinical programs of the Marlene
and Stewart Greenebaum Comprehensive Cancer Center
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 32,000,000
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
(B) R Adams Cowley Shock Trauma Center – Phase III. Provide a
grant to the University of Maryland Medical System to assist in
the design, construction, and equipping of Phase III of
renovations, upgrades, and expansion to the R Adams Cowley
Shock Trauma Center (Baltimore City) ...................................... 250,000
(C) University of Maryland Shore Regional Health – New Easton
Regional Medical Center. Provide a grant to the University of
Maryland Medical System to assist in the design, construction,
and equipping of a new campus and facilities for the University
of Maryland Shore Regional Health – Regional Medical Center
in Easton (Talbot County) ............................................................ 20,000,000
(D) University of Maryland Medical System Capital Region
Apheresis Machine. Provide funds to acquire an apheresis
machine (Prince George’s County) ................................................ 130,000
0
DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT
SA24 DIVISION OF NEIGHBORHOOD REVITALIZATION
(A) Baltimore Regional Neighborhood Initiative. Provide funds for
grants and loans to nonprofit community development
corporations or coalitions to fund comprehensive revitalization
strategies for Sustainable Communities in Baltimore City,
Baltimore County, and Anne Arundel County (Regional) .......... 27,000,000
18,000,000
Provided that $3,000,000 $7,550,000 $8,350,000 of this
authorization may be used only to provide grants as follows:
(1) Board of Directors of ReBUILD
Metro, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping to convert the
vacant factory at 508 East Preston
Street into the Machine Works
innovative center for innovative
manufacturers, creative firms,
small businesses, and non–profit
organizations (Baltimore City) ........ 3,000,000
– 19 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) Board of Trustees of the Great
Blacks in Wax Museum, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of the National Great Blacks in Wax
Museum (Baltimore City). ................ 500,000
(3) Preservation Alliance of Baltimore
County for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital
equipping of homes owned by
limited–income senior citizens for
infrastructure improvements to
historic properties (Baltimore
County) .............................................. 100,000
(4) ACTC New Community Hub.
Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Assistance Center of
Towson Churches, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of the ACTC New Community Hub to
enable ACTC to offer expanded
services such as a “choice pantry” for
people to choose foods they know and
need, promoting health and
reducing waste (Baltimore County) .. 300,000
(5) Darley Park Blight Elimination.
Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Baltimore Redlining
and Blight Elimination CDC for
acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of blighted homes in Darley Park for
the creation of affordable housing
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
(Baltimore City) ................................ 100,000
(6) Forest Park Renaissance. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of the
WBC Community Development
Corporation for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of blighted
residential and commercial
properties on and around the
business center at the intersection of
Liberty Heights and Garrison Blvd.
including two shovel ready projects:
Forest Park Gateway Center located
at 3901 Liberty Heights and a
recently acquired lot located at 3403
Garrison Blvd. (Baltimore City) ...... 375,000
400,000
(7) Live Life As You Dream – LLAYD.
Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Live Life As You Dream
(LLAYD) for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Live
Life As You Dream (LLAYD) project
to revitalize two vacant commercial
spaces at 1816 North Charles Street
(Baltimore City) ................................ 150,000
250,000
(8) Market Fresh Gourmet – Hampton
Park Redevelopment Poppleton.
Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Market Fresh Gourmet
Incorporated the Neighborhood
Impact Investment Fund for the
acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of the Market Fresh Gourmet
– 21 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
facilities (Baltimore City) ................. 500,000
(9) Residences at Lafayette. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of
Threshold Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the
Residences at Lafayette affordable
home construction (Baltimore
City) ................................................... 100,000
(10) Vacant to Vibrant – East Baltimore.
Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of A Strong Foundation
Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital
equipping of vacant homes in the
Darley Park, 4x4 and Berea
Communities, transforming them
into affordable homes to rebuild
communities (Baltimore City)........... 200,000
(11) Reed House. Provide a grant to the
Board of Trustees of the Players
Philanthropic Philanthropy Fund,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Reed House, a safe
space for youth in the Marble Hill
neighborhood during out–of–school
time (Baltimore City) ........................ 500,000
(12) Roberta’s House. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of Roberta’s
House Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the
Roberta’s House property including
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
the rooftop expansion, indoor
solarium, the restroom and
enclosure areas, and the community
memorial wall on west side ground
level (Baltimore City) ....................... 100,000
(13) Board of Directors of the Pleasant
Hope Community Development
Corporation for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of 422
Hutchins Avenue property
(Baltimore City) ............................... 125,000
200,000
(14) Board of Directors of ReBUILD
Metro, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping to complete
the acquisition, stabilization, and
pre–development of abandoned
properties for the ReBuild
Homeownership Works
Single–Family Rehabilitation
Initiative (Baltimore City) ................ 1,500,000
(15) HAVEN project. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of LAMB, Inc.
for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of The HAVEN redevelopment
project along the North Avenue
corridor (Baltimore City) .................. 100,000
(16) Darley Park Community
Preservation. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of Green Dollar
Project, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation,
– 23 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of severely
blighted homes for community
stability in Darley Park (Baltimore
City) ................................................... 100,000
(17) 4M Swim Club. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of The 4M
Swim Club, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the 4M
Swim Club Property, including the
scoreboard and basketball gym
repairs (Baltimore City) .................... 150,000
(18) Salvation Army Headquarters and
Community Center. Provide a grant
to the Board of Trustees of The
Salvation Army for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the
Salvation Army Headquarters and
Community Center (Baltimore
City) ................................................... 250,000
(B) Business Facade Improvement Program. Provide funds for
grants to subdivisions and community development
organizations to assist businesses located in Sustainable
Communities with improving the outside appearance of their
facilities (Statewide) ..................................................................... 5,000,000
(C) Community Legacy Program. Provide funds to assist
neighborhoods with revitalization efforts. The funds shall be
administered in accordance with §§ 6–201 through 6–211 of the
Housing and Community Development Article and Code of
Maryland Regulations (COMAR) 05.17.01. Provided that any
financial assistance awarded under this program is not subject
to § 8–301 of the State Finance and Procurement Article
(Statewide) .................................................................................... 8,000,000
Provided that $2,700,000 of this authorization may be used only
to provide grants as follows:
– 24 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
(1) Montgomery County, Maryland for
the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of the Olney Community Hub
Building (Montgomery County) ........ 2,700,000
(D) National Capital Strategic Economic Development Fund.
Provide funds to assist government agencies and nonprofit
community development organizations to assist in
predevelopment activities for commercial and residential
development, including site acquisition, land assembly,
architecture and engineering, and site development for
revitalization in areas of the National Capital Region as set
forth by § 6–710 of the Housing and Community Development
Article (Regional) .......................................................................... 12,000,000
18,000,000
Provided that $4,000,000 $8,000,000 $9,400,000 of this
authorization may be used only to provide grants as follows:
(1) Board of Directors of the College
Park City – University Partnership
for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of the College Park Airport,
including stormwater and floodplain
management (Prince George’s
County) .............................................. 3,000,000
(2) Board of Directors of S.E.E.D. for
the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of pedestrian and infrastructure
improvements related to affordable
housing projects adjacent to the
Glenridge Purple Line Station
(Prince George’s County) .................. 1,000,000
(3) Viva White Oak. Provide a grant to
– 25 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
the Maryland Economic
Development Corporation for the
acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of the Viva White Oak project
(Montgomery County) ....................... 3,600,000
4,000,000
(4) Montgomery County, Maryland for
the capital equipping of small
business in the 7551 block of New
Hampshire Avenue in Takoma Park
(Montgomery County) ....................... 200,000
(5) Montgomery County, Maryland for
the capital equipping of small
business in the four corners area of
the intersection of Georgia Avenue
and University Blvd., 2400 through
2500 University Blvd. area, and
11200 through 11400 block of
Georgia Avenue in Wheaton
(Montgomery County) ....................... 200,000
(6) Central Kenilworth Avenue
Revitalization Community
Development Corporation for the
acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement of the Purple Line and
Connectivity Project (Prince George’s
County) .............................................. 1,000,000
(E) Neighborhood Business Development Program. Provide funds
for grants and loans to fund community–based economic
development activities in revitalization areas designated by
local governments, including food desert projects in designated
food deserts. The funds shall be administered in accordance
with §§ 6–301 through 6–311 of the Housing and Community
Development Article (Statewide) ................................................. 10,000,000
(F) Seed Community Development Anchor Institution Fund.
Provide funds for grants to higher education and health care
– 26 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
institutions for community enhancement projects in
sustainable communities and blighted areas. The funds shall
be administered in accordance with § 4–509 of the Housing and
Community Development Article (Statewide) ............................ 10,000,000
Provided that $7,500,000 $10,000,000 $7,000,000 of this
authorization may be used only to provide grants as follows:
(1) Downtown Partnership of Baltimore
– Strategic Operations Center.
Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Downtown
Partnership of Baltimore, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of a new Strategic Operations
Center (Baltimore City) .................... 5,000,000
2,000,000
(2) IonQ Capital of Quantum Initiative
for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of the IonQ Headquarters Project
(Prince George’s County) .................. 2,500,000
5,000,000
(G) Strategic Demolition Fund. Provide funds for grants and loans
to government agencies and community development
organizations for demolition, land assembly, architecture and
engineering, and site development in designated Sustainable
Communities. The funds shall be administered in accordance
with § 4–508 of the Housing and Community Development
Article. Provided that any financial assistance awarded under
this program is not subject to § 8–301 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article (Statewide) ................................................. 60,000,000
Provided that $2,000,000 $4,500,000 $5,900,000 of this
authorization may be used only to provide grants as follows:
(1) Board of Directors of the College
Park City – University Partnership,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
– 27 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital
equipping of infrastructure
improvements to properties near the
College Park Airport (Prince
George’s County) ............................... 2,000,000
(2) Montgomery County, Maryland for
the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of Olney Community Hub Building
(Montgomery County) ....................... 2,500,000
(3) Baltimore Vacants Fund. Provide a
grant to Baltimore City Parks and
Recreation for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Robert
L. Dalton Stadium (Baltimore
City) .................................................. 1,400,000
SA25 DIVISION OF DEVELOPMENT FINANCE
(Statewide)
(A) Appraisal Gap Program – UPLIFT. Provide gap financing to
developers and homeowners for the difference between the
value of mortgages for distressed properties and their value
after renovation. This program operates in select areas of the
State where homes have been determined to be undervalued
and have historically lacked investment. These funds shall be
administered in accordance with §§ 4–2801 through 4–2806 of
the Housing and Community Development Article .................... 10,000,000
(B) Homeownership Programs. Provide funds for below–market
interest rate mortgages with minimum down payments to
low– and moderate–income homebuyers. These funds shall be
administered in accordance with §§ 4–235 through 4–241,
4–501, 4–502, 4–801 through 4–810, and 4–814 through 4–816
of the Housing and Community Development Article. Provided
that any financial assistance awarded under this program is
not subject to § 8–301 of the State Finance and Procurement
– 28 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
Article............................................................................................ 8,000,000
(C) Partnership Rental Housing Program. Provide funds to be
credited to the Partnership Rental Housing Fund to be
administered in accordance with §§ 4–501, 4–503, and 4–1201
through 4–1209 of the Housing and Community Development
Article............................................................................................ 8,000,000
6,000,000
(D) Rental Housing Programs. Provide funds for rental housing
developments that serve low– and moderate–income
households. The funds shall be administered in accordance
with §§ 4–401 through 4–411, 4–501, and 4–504 of the Housing
and Community Development Article ......................................... 85,000,000
Provided that $3,000,000 of this authorization may be used
only to provide grants as follows:
(1) Community First Development
Corporation 210 on the Park project
for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of the 210 on the Park project
(Prince George’s County) .................. 3,000,000
(E) Shelter and Transitional Housing Facilities Grant Program.
Provide grants to acquire, design, construct, renovate, and
equip emergency shelters, transitional housing, and other
facilities for homeless individuals and families. The funds shall
be administered in accordance with Code of Maryland
Regulations (COMAR) 05.05.09 ................................................... 3,000,000
(F) Special Loan Programs. Provide funds to low– and
moderate–income families, sponsors of rental properties
occupied primarily by limited–income families, and nonprofit
sponsors of housing facilities, including group homes and
shelters to bring housing up to code and remediate lead paint
hazards. These funds shall be administered in accordance with
§§ 4–501, 4–505, 4–601 through 4–612, 4–701 through 4–712,
4–901 through 4–923, 4–928, 4–930, 4–931, and 4–933 of the
Housing and Community Development Article. Provided that
any financial assistance awarded under this program is not
subject to § 8–301 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article............................................................................................ 4,000,000
– 29 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(G) Housing Innovation Fund. Provide funds to be credited to the
Housing Innovation Fund to be administered in accordance
with §§ 4–512 and 4–3001 through 4–3005 of the Housing and
Community Development Article ................................................ 5,000,000
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
TG00 DIVISION OF MARKETING, TOURISM, AND THE ARTS
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland Arts Capital Grant Program. Provide funds to
eligible organizations for the acquisition, expansion,
renovation, or major repair of facilities or other infrastructure.
This program shall be administered in accordance with § 4–514
of the Economic Development Article ......................................... 3,000,000
DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT
UA01 OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY
(Statewide)
(A) Comprehensive Flood Management Grant Program. Provide
funds to local governments for projects that reduce the risk of
loss of life and property from flooding. Grant funds may be used
to acquire flood–prone properties for demolition or relocation,
install flood warning systems, and construct flood control
projects, including engineering studies required to support the
design of these projects. Capital projects that assist with flood
management techniques may include but are not limited to:
flood control dams, levees and dikes, stormwater detention or
retention structures, and flood proofing ..................................... 13,867,000
(B) Maryland Drinking Water Revolving Loan Fund. Provide funds
to finance drinking water projects. The funds shall be
administered in accordance with § 9–1605.1 of the
Environment Article .................................................................... 11,488,000
(C) Maryland Water Quality Revolving Loan Fund. Provide funds
to finance water quality improvement projects. The funds shall
be administered in accordance with § 9–1605 of the
Environment Article .................................................................... 15,029,000
UB00 MARYLAND ENVIRONMENTAL SERVICE
(Statewide)
– 30 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
(A) State Water and Sewer Infrastructure Improvement Fund.
Provide funds to design, construct, and equip water and
wastewater facility improvements for State institutions,
provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may
commence on a project prior to the appropriation of all funds
necessary to complete the project. Expenditures for a project
detailed in the Fiscal Year 2026 Capital Budget Volume under
this program may not exceed the amount listed therein by more
than 7.5% without notification to the General Assembly. Funds
may be spent only on the projects listed under this program in
the Fiscal Year 2026 Capital Budget Volume or on prior or
future authorized projects. Expenditure of any part of this
appropriation for a prior or future authorized project shall also
require notification to the General Assembly ............................ 2,598,000
VE01 DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE SERVICES
(Baltimore City)
(A) Maryland Youth Residence Center Renovation and Expansion.
Provide funds to continue design of the renovation and
expansion of a residential treatment center for male youths in
Baltimore City ............................................................................. 1,150,000
WA01 DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE
(A) Barrack A – Waterloo: New Barrack, Garage, and Historic
Barrack Renovation. Provide funds to begin design of a new
barrack, garage, and the renovation of a historic barrack in
Waterloo (Howard County) ......................................................... 523,000
(B) Barrack J – Annapolis: Communications Room and New
Garage. Provide funds to complete design and begin
construction and equipping of a new garage and the renovation
of Barrack J in Annapolis for a new communications room,
provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may
commence on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds
necessary to complete this project (Anne Arundel County) ....... 5,042,000
(C) Barrack L – Forestville: New Barrack and Garage. Provide
funds to complete design and continue construction of a
replacement barrack and garage in Forestville, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may commence on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project (Prince George’s County) ......................... 7,376,000
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
– 31 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) Adventist Health – New Fort Washington Facility. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of Adventist HealthCare Fort
Washington Medical Center, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
new facility for Adventist Health in Fort Washington (Prince
George’s County) ......................................................................... 2,500,000
5,000,000
4,000,000
(B) Annapolis City Dock. Provide a grant to the Mayor and City
Council of the City of Annapolis for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
resiliency projects that directly mitigate the impacts of sea level
rise resilience and revitalization projects at the Annapolis City
Dock (Anne Arundel County) ...................................................... 8,800,000
7,800,000
(C) B & O Railroad Museum. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the B & O Railroad Museum for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements to the B & O Railroad Museum
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 3,000,000
(D) Baltimore County – 911 Call Center. Provide a grant to the
County Executive and County Council of Baltimore County for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Baltimore County’s 911 Call Center
(Baltimore County) ...................................................................... 2,000,000
(E) Baltimore Museum of Art – Fire Suppression and Capital
Improvements. Provide a grant to the governing board of The
Baltimore Museum of Art, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Baltimore Museum of Art facility, including fire suppression
and related improvements (Baltimore City) .............................. 1,500,000
(F) Bowie Mill Bike Trail. Provide a grant to the County Executive
and County Council of Montgomery County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
– 32 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
Bowie Mill bike trail (Montgomery County) .............................. 2,100,000
(G) Bowie Race Course Training Center Property and Rosecroft
Raceway. Provide a grant to the County Executive and County
Council of Prince George’s County for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of land
and structures on and around the Bowie Race Course Training
Center Property and Rosecroft Raceway (Prince George’s
County) ........................................................................................ 6,200,000
(H) Catholic Charities – Intergenerational Center. Provide a grant
to the Board of Directors of the Associated Catholic Charities
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Catholic Charities Intergenerational
Center (Baltimore City) .............................................................. 2,000,000
(I) Center for Urban Families – North Monroe Street Capital
Improvements. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the
Center of Urban Families for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the North Monroe
Street building (Baltimore City) ................................................. 1,000,000
(J) Downtown Partnership of Baltimore – Strategic Operations
Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the
Downtown Partnership of Baltimore, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
new Strategic Operations Center in Baltimore City (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 5,000,000
0
(K) Glen Echo Park Spanish Ballroom Renovation. Provide a grant
to the County Executive and County Council of Montgomery
County for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the historic Glen Echo
Park Spanish Ballroom (Montgomery County) .......................... 1,500,000
(L) Greater Baden Medical Services – Ritchie Station Health
Center. Provide a grant to the Greater Baden Medical Services,
Inc. for the acquisition of property for a Federally Qualified
Health Center facility known as Ritchie Station Health Center
(Prince George’s County) .............................................................. 2,900,000
– 33 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(M) Historic Annapolis Restoration. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of Historic Annapolis, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Brice House, Paca House, and other State–owned historic
properties leased to Historic Annapolis, Inc. (Anne Arundel
County) ......................................................................................... 3,900,000
(N) Howard County – New Cultural Center. Provide a grant to the
Howard County Housing Commission for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
new Cultural Center in Columbia (Howard County) .................. 2,000,000
4,000,000
(O) Inner Harbor Promenade. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Waterfront Management Authority for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of infrastructure improvements for the Inner Harbor
Promenade (Baltimore City) ....................................................... 38,000,000
35,000,000
(P) Johns Hopkins Bayview Medical Center – Burton Pavilion
Renovation. Provide a grant to the Board of Trustees of The
Johns Hopkins Health System for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
John R. Burton Pavilion at the Johns Hopkins Bayview Medical
Center (Baltimore City) .............................................................. 8,000,000
(Q) Kennedy Krieger Hospital – Innovative Care Center. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of the Kennedy Krieger
Institute, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvements, and capital equipping of a new Innovative
Care Center (Baltimore City) ...................................................... 4,000,000
(R) Luminis Health Doctors Community Medical Center – New
Obstetrical Care Tower. Provide a grant to the Luminis Health
Doctors Community Medical Center, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements to the Luminis Health Doctors
Community Medical Center, including a new tower for
– 34 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
obstetrical care (Prince George’s County) ................................... 10,000,000
20,000,000
19,000,000
(S) Maryland Center for History and Culture – Enoch Pratt House
and Collections Storage Renovation. Provide a grant to the
Maryland Center for History and Culture for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Enoch Pratt House and Library Collections Storage (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 2,500,000
(T) Maryland Independent College and University Association –
Hood College. Provide a grant equal to the lesser of (i)
$2,480,000 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided, to
the Board of Trustees of Hood College for the design,
construction, and equipping of the renovation and expansion of
Hodson Annex, subject to the requirement that the grantee
provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1(5) of this Act, the
matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Frederick County) .............................. 2,480,000
(U) Maryland Independent College and University Association –
McDaniel College. Provide a grant equal to the lesser of (i)
$2,160,000 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided, to
the Board of Trustees of McDaniel College for the design,
construction, and equipping of the renovation of the Merritt
Hall, subject to the requirement that the grantee provide an
equal and matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding the
provisions of Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may
consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this Act
(Carroll County)............................................................................ 2,160,000
(V) Maryland Independent College and University Association –
Stevenson University. Provide a grant equal to the lesser of (i)
$3,360,000 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided, to
the Board of Trustees of Stevenson University for the design
and construction of a new Music and Performing Arts Wing,
subject to the requirement that the grantee provide an equal
and matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding the
provisions of Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may
consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this Act
(Baltimore County) ...................................................................... 3,360,000
(W) Maryland Zoo in Baltimore – Infrastructure and Habitat
– 35 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Improvements. Provide a grant to the Board of Trustees of the
Maryland Zoological Society, Inc. to assist in funding the
design, construction, and equipping of building, infrastructure,
and habitat improvements for the exhibits and operations of
the Maryland Zoo in Baltimore (Baltimore City) ........................ 4,750,000
(X) MedStar Southern Maryland Hospital. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of MedStar Southern Maryland Hospital
Center, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure
improvements to MedStar Southern Maryland Hospital (Prince
George’s County) .......................................................................... 10,000,000
(Y) Morton Street Dance Center Renovation and Expansion.
Provide a grant to the Morton Street Dance Center for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Morton Street Dance Center, including an
addition (Baltimore City) ............................................................. 300,000
(Z) National Aquarium in Baltimore – Infrastructure
Improvements. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the
National Aquarium in Baltimore, Inc. to assist in the design,
construction, renovation, and equipping of infrastructure
improvements at the National Aquarium in Baltimore
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 1,000,000
(AA) New Edgewater Community Center. Provide a grant to the
County Executive and County Council of Anne Arundel County
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of a new community center in Edgewater
(Anne Arundel County) ................................................................ 2,000,000
2,250,000
(AB) Pikesville Armory Foundation – Pikesville Armory Renovation.
Provide a grant to the governing board of the Pikesville Armory
Foundation, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Pikesville
Armory (Baltimore County) ........................................................ 5,000,000
(AC) Port Discovery Children’s Museum. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of The Baltimore Children’s Museum, Inc.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
– 36 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Port Discovery Children’s Museum
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 2,500,000
(AD) Rosecroft Raceway Economic Revitalization. Provide a grant to
Prince George’s Financial Services Corporation d.b.a. FSC
First for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the property
immediately surrounding Rosecroft Raceway (Prince George’s
County) ......................................................................................... 3,100,000
(AE) Salisbury Regional Airport – New Hangar. Provide a grant to
the County Council of Wicomico County, Maryland for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of a new hangar at Salisbury–Ocean City: Wicomico
Regional Airport (Wicomico County) .......................................... 1,500,000
(AF) Southern Streams Health and Wellness Center. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of the Mary Harvin
Transformation Center for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of Southern Streams
Health and Wellness Center (Baltimore City) ............................ 2,100,000
(AG) Viva White Oak. Provide a grant to the Maryland Economic
Development Corporation for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Viva White Oak
project (Montgomery County) ...................................................... 6,000,000
2,000,000
(AH) Westport Capital Development – Kloman Street Relocation.
Provide a grant to the Westport Capital Development
Corporation, LLC for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the relocation and
realignment of Kloman Street in Baltimore City (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 1,000,000
(AI) White’s Ferry Project. Provide a grant to the County Executive
and County Council of Montgomery County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
White’s Ferry Project (Montgomery County) ............................. 1,500,000
– 37 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(AJ) Westminster Fiber Project. Provide a grant to the Mayor and
City Council of Westminster for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Westminster fiber optic network project (Carroll County) ......... 500,000
1,000,000
(AK) Discovery Point Redevelopment Project. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the College Park City – University
Partnership, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Discovery Point
Redevelopment project (Prince George’s County) ....................... 1,000,000
0
(AL) Strathmore Hall Performing Arts Center. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of Strathmore Hall Foundation, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Strathmore Hall Performing Arts Center
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. 1,500,000
(AM) Capital of Quantum Initiative. Provide a grant to the
University of Maryland Enterprise Corporation for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of projects in the Discovery District (Prince George’s
County) ......................................................................................... 5,000,000
10,000,000
(AN) College Park Academy Multi–Purpose & Gym Space. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of College Park Academy, Inc.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the College Park Academy Multi–Purpose
& Gym Space (Prince George’s County) ...................................... 2,000,000
1,775,000
(AO) St. Vincent Pallotti High School. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of St. Vincent Pallotti High School, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of St. Vincent Pallotti High School, including a black
box theatre (Prince George’s County) .......................................... 550,000
800,000
– 38 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
(AP) Idlewylde Community Hall. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of The Idlewylde Improvement Association, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Idlewylde Community Hall (Baltimore
County) ......................................................................................... 140,000
0
(AQ) Boonsboro Public Works Complex. Provide a grant to the
Mayor and Town Council of the Town of Boonsboro for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the public works complex (Washington County) ... 175,000
(AR) Williamsport Town Hall. Provide a grant to the Mayor and
Town Council of the Town of Williamsport for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Williamsport Town Hall (Washington County) .......................... 30,000
280,000
400,000
(AS) Harris Farm. Provide a grant to the Burgess and
Commissioners of the Town of Middletown for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Harris Farm project (Frederick County) ..................................... 175,000
475,000
(AT) Next One Up Facility. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of Next One Up Foundation, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Next One Up facility (Baltimore City) ........................................ 500,000
(AU) Krimson Achievement Foundation. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of Krimson Achievement Foundation for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Krimson Achievement Foundation facilities
(Prince George’s County) ............................................................. 300,000
(AV) Ellicott City 50+ Center. Provide a grant to the County
Executive and County Council of Howard County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
– 39 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Ellicott City 50+ Center including entrance ADA
accessibility improvements (Howard County) ............................ 100,000
(AW) Howard County Fairgrounds – Fiber Optic Connectivity.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the Howard County
Fair Association, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of Howard County
Fairgrounds property, including fiber optic connectivity
(Howard County) .......................................................................... 70,000
(AX) Ilchester Community Center. Provide a grant to the County
Executive and County Council of Howard County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Ilchester Community Center (Howard County) .... 200,000
(AY) Preservation Maryland Headquarters at Howard County.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of The Society for the
Preservation of Maryland Antiquities, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
historic Ellicott City Jail (Howard County) ................................ 250,000
(AZ) Residences at Vantage Point. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Columbia Vantage House Corp. d/b/a Residences
at Vantage Point for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of Residences at
Vantage Point Continuing Care Retirement Community
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. 125,000
(BA) Rockburn Branch Park. Provide a grant to the County
Executive and County Council of Howard County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Rockburn Branch Park including a new restroom
facility (Howard County) .............................................................. 50,000
(BB) DSP Training Academy at Jubilee Association of Maryland.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of The Jubilee
Association of Maryland, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
DSP Training Academy at Jubilee Association of Maryland
– 40 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. 50,000
(BC) Ivymount School. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
The Ivymount School, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of The Ivymount
School aging school upgrades project (Montgomery County) ..... 85,000
250,000
(BD) Attick Towers Fire Suspension. Provide a grant to the Mayor
and City Council of the City of College Park for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
fire suppression system for the Attick Towers property (Prince
George’s County) .......................................................................... 325,000
(BE) Youth and Family Services. Provide a grant to the Mayor and
City Council of the City of College Park for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Youth and Family Services facilities including exterior
improvements (Prince George’s County) ..................................... 250,000
(BF) Eagle Harbor Flood Mitigation. Provide a grant to the Mayor
and Town Council of the Town of Eagle Harbor for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Eagle Harbor Flood Mitigation project (Prince
George’s County) .......................................................................... 200,000
(BG) Fraternal Order of Police Lodge No. 89. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the Fraternal Order of Police, Prince
George’s County for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Fraternal Order
of Police Lodge No. 89 including paving, ADA access, grading
and drainage modifications (Prince George’s County)................ 1,500,000
(BH) New Downtown Hagerstown Visitor Center. Provide a grant to
the Washington County, Maryland Convention and Visitors
Bureau, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of a new visitor center
(Washington County) ................................................................... 240,000
540,000
– 41 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(BI) Pearlstone Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
the Pearlstone Conference and Retreat Center for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Pearlstone Center (Baltimore County) .................. 500,000
(BJ) Music City Maryland Amphitheater. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the Music City Maryland Association Inc.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Music City Maryland Amphitheater
project (Baltimore County) .......................................................... 300,000
400,000
(BK) Arbutus Marketplace. Provide a grant to the County Executive
and County Council of Baltimore County Board of Directors of
Southwest Visions Foundation LLC for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Arbutus Marketplace (Baltimore County) .................................. 500,000
650,000
550,000
(BL) CAA Park Playground. Provide a grant to the Baltimore
County Department of Recreation and Parks Christian Athletic
Association for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of CAA Park, including a
playground (Baltimore County) ................................................... 100,000
(BM) Jewish Community Service’s Alternative Living Unit Program.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of Jewish Community
Services, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Jewish
Community Service’s Alternative Living Unit Program
(Baltimore County) ....................................................................... 300,000
(BN) Mason Dixon Complex – Phase II. Provide a grant to the
County Executive and County Council of Wicomico County for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Phase II of the Mason Dixon Complex
project, which will include construction of the parking lot and
site amenities (Wicomico County) ............................................... 100,000
– 42 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
(BO) National Aquarium Capital Improvements. Provide a grant to
the National Aquarium, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
National Aquarium Capital Improvements (Baltimore City) .... 500,000
(BP) Black Sox Park. Provide a grant to Parks and People, Inc. and
the South Baltimore Gateway Partnership for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Black Sox Park (Baltimore City) ................................................. 3,000,000
(BQ) Kennedy Krieger Institute – LEAP Facility Renovation and
Expansion. Provide a grant to the Kennedy Krieger Institute,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of facilities for the
Lifeskill and Education for Students with Autism and other
Pervasive Behavioral Challenges (LEAP) program (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 300,000
550,000
(BR) Bender Jewish Community Center of Greater Washington.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the Bender Jewish
Community Center of Greater Washington, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Bender Jewish Community Center of Greater
Washington building (Montgomery County) ............................... 120,000
240,000
(BS) Sunflower Bakery. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
Sunflower Bakery, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Sunflower
Bakery including a delivery vehicle (Montgomery County) ....... 30,000
(BT) National Center on Institutions and Alternatives. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of the National Center on
Institutions and Alternatives, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
various National Center on Institutions and Alternatives
properties including residences, the YIT School, a school auto
training center, and a career development center (Baltimore
County) ......................................................................................... 500,000
– 43 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(BU) Maryland Science Center. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of the Maryland Academy of Science for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of infrastructure improvements to the Maryland
Science Center (Baltimore City) .................................................. 3,000,000
(BV) New Randallstown Library and Recreational Center. Provide a
grant to the County Executive and County Council of Baltimore
County for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvements, and capital equipping of the new Randallstown
Library and Recreational Center (Baltimore County) ................ 8,855,000
8,255,000
(BW) Cube CoWork, LLC. Provide a grant to the Cube CoWork, LLC
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of a project located at 4709 Harford Road
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ 100,000
(BX) Westside Redevelopment Authority. Provide a grant to the
Westside Redevelopment Authority for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Westside Redevelopment Authority (Baltimore County) ........... 500,000
(BY) Cowdensville Roundabout. Provide a grant to the Baltimore
County Department of Public Works and Transportation for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of a roundabout at the intersection of
Shelbourne Road and Sulphur Spring Road (Baltimore City) ... 2,000,000
(BZ) McElderry Park Resource Center. Provide a grant to the
McElderry Park Community Association, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of McElderry Park Resource Center (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 150,000
(CA) Collington Square Park Improvements. Provide a grant to the
Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
– 44 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
Collington Square Park Improvements (Baltimore City) ........... 200,000
(CB) The Sanctuary. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of The
Sanctuary for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of The Sanctuary
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ 100,000
(CC) Riverside Park Pool and Bathhouse. Provide a grant to the
Baltimore City Department of Recreation and Parks for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Riverside Park Pool and Bathhouse
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ 750,000
(CD) Goodwill of Greater Washington. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of Goodwill of Greater Washington for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Goodwill of Greater Washington infrastructure
improvements (Prince George’s County) ..................................... 250,000
(CE) Community Boys and Girls Club in Capitol Heights. Provide a
grant to the Mayor and Council of The Town of Capitol Heights
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Community Boys and Girls Club in Capitol
Heights (Prince George’s County) ............................................... 250,000
(CF) Publick Playhouse. Provide a grant to the Maryland–National
Capital Park and Planning Commission for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Publick Playhouse (Prince George’s County) .............................. 500,000
1,200,000
(CG) Town of Bladensburg Property Acquisition. Provide a grant to
the Town of Bladensburg for the acquisition of property for the
new Town Hall (Prince George’s County) ................................... 1,000,000
(CH) Cal Ripken Sr. Foundation. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Cal Ripken Sr. Foundation for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
science, technology, engineering, and math centers built by the
Cal Ripken Sr. Foundation (Statewide) ...................................... 300,000
– 45 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
600,000
(CI) New Hampshire Estates Neighborhood Parks. Provide a grant
to the Board of Commissioners of the Maryland–National
Capital Park and Planning Commission for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
project properties including a lighted soccer field (Montgomery
County) ......................................................................................... 500,000
600,000
(CJ) Children’s Inn at the National Institutes of Health. Provide a
grant to the Children’s Inn at NIH, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of two
Water Fountains/Bottle Dispensers and three Public
Restrooms in a new 15,000–square–foot wing to support NIH
pediatric research (Montgomery County) ................................... 200,000
(CK) Imagination Stage. Provide a grant to the Board of Trustees of
Imagination Stage, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Imagination
Stage facilities, including safety and accessibility
improvements (Montgomery County) .......................................... 200,000
(CL) National Center for Children and Families – Re–Engineering
A Safe Space. Provide a grant to the Board of Trustees of The
National Center for Children and Families, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of a guard station with 24–hour monitoring to
protect the residents, the staff, and the surrounding
neighborhood from uninvited persons (youth and adults) access
and unwanted private property intrusion (Montgomery
County) ......................................................................................... 150,000
(CM) North Bethesda Metro Station Access Improvements. Provide
a grant to the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit
Authority for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the North Bethesda
Metro Station (Montgomery County) .......................................... 600,000
(CN) Sunnyside School. Provide a grant to the Board of Education of
Anne Arundel County Anne Arundel County and Severn
– 46 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
Improvement Association, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Sunnyside School (Anne Arundel County) .................................. 25,000
(CO) Shipley Homestead Homeowner’s Association. Provide a grant
to Shipley Homestead Homeowner’s Association, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Shipley Homestead Homeowner’s Association
(Anne Arundel County) ................................................................ 100,000
(CP) Bacontown Park. Provide a grant to the Anne Arundel County
Department of Recreation and Parks for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Bacontown Park for a pavilion at the park in Laurel (Anne
Arundel County) ........................................................................... 50,000
(CQ) Ferndale Community Club. Provide a grant to the Ferndale
Community Club, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of Ferndale
Community Club (Anne Arundel County) ................................... 50,000
(CR) Overlook Elementary School. Provide a grant to Anne Arundel
County for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Overlook Elementary
School, including a new electronic sign (Anne Arundel
County) ......................................................................................... 50,000
(CS) Public School Construction. Provide a grant to Montgomery
County, Maryland to fund the design, construction, and capital
equipping of public school buildings and public school capital
improvements. Notwithstanding any other provision of law
these funds are not subject to any local match requirements
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. 4,500,000
(CT) Eastern Technical High School Multi–Sport Complex. Provide
a grant to the Board of Education of Baltimore County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Eastern Technical High School Multi–Sport
Complex property (Baltimore County) ........................................ 150,000
– 47 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(CU) Heartly House Facilities Expansion. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of Heartly House, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Heartly House facilities (Frederick County) ............................... 200,000
700,000
(CV) Love Wins Movement. Provide a grant to Love Wins Movement,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Love Wins
Movement project (Anne Arundel County) ................................. 150,000
(CW) Aberdeen Family Swim Center. Provide a grant to the Mayor
and City Council of the City of Aberdeen for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Aberdeen Family Swim Center (Harford County) ...................... 500,000
(CX) Town of Chesapeake Beach – Tennis Courts. Provide a grant to
the Town of Chesapeake Beach for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Town of Chesapeake Beach tennis courts (Calvert County) ...... 500,000
(CY) Messick Road Industrial Park Development. Provide a grant to
the Cumberland Economic Development Corporation for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Messick Road Industrial Park Development
(Allegany County)......................................................................... 100,000
(CZ) Glen Burnie High School. Provide a grant to the Board of
Education of Anne Arundel County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Glen Burnie High School (Anne Arundel County) ...................... 250,000
(DA) Medstar Hospital Infrastructure Improvements. Provide a
grant to the Medstar Hospital System for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements to the Medstar Hospital System
(Statewide) .................................................................................... 1,000,000
1,500,000
– 48 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
(DB) Bates Lower Field Improvements. Provide a grant to the Mayor
and City Council of the City of Annapolis for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Bates Lower Field improvements project (Anne Arundel
County) ......................................................................................... 500,000
(DC) Charles County Charitable Trust. Provide a grant to Charles
County Charitable Trust, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Charles County Charitable Trust project (Charles County) ...... 75,000
(DD) The Arc Capital Housing Project. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of The Arc Carroll County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of The
Arc Capital Housing Project (Carroll County) ............................ 150,000
(DE) Carroll Veterans Short Term Housing and Bathrooms. Provide
a grant to the Board of Directors of the Carroll County
Veterans Independence Project for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Carroll Veterans Short Term Housing and Bathrooms (Carroll
County) ......................................................................................... 50,000
(DF) Mount Airy Flat Iron Building. Provide a grant to the Mayor
and Council of Mount Airy for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Mount Airy Flat
Iron Building (Carroll County) .................................................... 50,000
(DG) Union Memorial Veterans of Foreign Wars Post No. 8806.
Provide a grant to the Officers of Union Memorial Post No.
8806 Veterans of Foreign Wars of the United States,
Incorporated for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Union
Memorial Veterans of Foreign Wars Post No. 8806 including
roof replacement (Carroll County) ............................................... 50,000
(DH) Berwyn House Road and Paint Branch Bridge. Provide a grant
to the Board of Directors of the College Park City – University
Partnership, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
– 49 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Berwyn House
Road and Paint Branch bridge project (Prince George’s
County) ......................................................................................... 1,000,000
0
(DI) Baltimore Public Media. Provide a grant to the Baltimore
Public Media Corporation for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Baltimore
Public Media project (Baltimore City) ......................................... 500,000
(DJ) Chimes Outdoor Adaptive Therapeutic Center. Provide a grant
to the Board of Directors of The Chimes, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Chimes Outdoor Adaptive Therapeutic Center (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 250,000
750,000
(DK) Chaney Cares Community Center. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of Chaney Cares, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Chaney Cares Community Center (Anne Arundel County) ....... 250,000
750,000
(DL) Mechanic and Harrison Street Intersection Widening. Provide
a grant to the Mayor and City Council of the City of Cumberland
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the intersection of Mechanic and Harrison
Street (Allegany County) .............................................................. 100,000
(DM) Baltimore–Washington International Thurgood Marshall
Airport Storefront – Visitor Experience. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of Visit Annapolis & Anne Arundel County,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of a new visitor focused storefront and
information center at Baltimore Washington International
Thurgood Marshall Airport (Anne Arundel County) .................. 50,000
(DN) Gaudenzia Crownsville Campus. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of Gaudenzia Foundation, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
– 50 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
Gaudenzia Crownsville Campus property (Anne Arundel
County) .......................................................................................... 350,000
(DO) Glen Burnie Center Medicine and Behavioral Health Build Out.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of Chase Brexton
Health Services, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of a primary care and
behavioral Health Center that Chase Brexton will renovate to
create additional space for the delivery of care to low–income
populations (Anne Arundel County) ............................................ 50,000
(DP) Zero Waste to Zero Hunger Facility. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of 4MyCiTy Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Zero Waste to Zero Hunger facility (Anne Arundel County) ....... 250,000
(DQ) Artificial Intelligence Machine Manufacturing – Workforce
Development Academy. Provide a grant to the Officers of 1103
N. Washington LLC for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the historic building at
1103 N. Washington Street which will provide the space for
skills training, job placement, and support for community
entrepreneurs, fostering economic growth and revitalization in
East Baltimore (Baltimore City) .................................................. 100,000
(DR) BEAR Renovations. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
BEAR/Belair Edison Area Revitalization, Inc for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the BEAR food distribution, and certification
training facilities (Baltimore City) .............................................. 40,000
(DS) Dr. Nathan A. Pitts–Ashburton Elementary. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of KABOOM! for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of Dr.
Nathan A. Pitts–Ashburton Elementary School including the
design and build of new playground facilities (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................... 160,000
(DT) Entrepreneurs Helping Entrepreneurs Facility. Provide a grant
to the Officers of Bendow Benbow Concession Services LLC for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
– 51 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Entrepreneurs Helping Entrepreneurs
facility (Baltimore City) ................................................................ 37,500
(DU) Guilford Hall – Commercial Training Kitchen. Provide a grant
to the Board of Directors of Employ Prince George’s, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of a new commercial training kitchen in a currently
vacant two–story building (Baltimore City) ................................ 100,000
(DV) Harford House. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the
Govans Ecumenical Development Corporation for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Harford House renovation project (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................... 100,000
(DW) Herring Run Branch Library. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Enoch Pratt Free Library for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Herring Run Branch Library including foundation work
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ 250,000
(DX) Sinclair Lane Elementary School. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of KABOOM! for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Sinclair Lane
Elementary School including playground renovation
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ 80,000
(DY) Southern Bridge Career and Education Center. Provide a grant
to the Board of Directors of The Mary Harvin Transformation
Center Community Development Corporation, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of a 25,000 sq ft warehouse across from the Southern
Views Workforce housing, for Early Childhood/Headstart
space and workforce training space (Baltimore City) ................. 100,000
(DZ) Town of Eagle Harbor Town Hall. Provide a grant to the Board
of Commissioners of the Town of Eagle Harbor for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Town of Eagle Harbor Town Hall including
– 52 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
roof, HVAC, and numerous other facility repairs (Prince
George’s County) ........................................................................... 100,000
(EA) Wells Community Development Corporation. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of Wells Community Development
Corporation for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the property at 3902–14 W Overlea
Avenue (Baltimore City) ............................................................... 40,000
(EB) Mays Chapel Elementary School. Provide a grant to the Board
of Education of Baltimore County for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Mays Chapel Elementary School facilities including the
playground (Baltimore County) ................................................... 100,000
(EC) Chesapeake High School Turf Field. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the Chesapeake High School Sports
Boosters Club, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of a turf field for
Chesapeake High School (Baltimore County) .............................. 250,000
(ED) Kesser Torah Community Recreation Center. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of Mesivta Kesser Torah of Baltimore Inc.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Kesser Torah Community Recreation
Center (Baltimore County) ........................................................... 100,000
0
(EE) American Legion Gray Ray Post No. 220. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the American Legion Gray Ray Post No.
220 for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the American Legion Gray Ray Post
No. 220 (Calvert County) .............................................................. 35,000
(EF) Benedictine School for Exceptional Children – Student
Residential Facility. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of The Benedictine School for Exceptional Children, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Benedictine School for Exceptional Children
property including the Student Residential Facility (Caroline
– 53 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
County) .......................................................................................... 500,000
(EG) Anna Murray Douglass Museum and Visitor Center. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of the Bailey–Groce Family
Foundation Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Anna Murray
Douglass Museum and Visitor Center (Caroline County) ........... 100,000
(EH) FOP Cambridge–Dorchester Lodge No. 27. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of the Fraternal Order of Police,
Cambridge–Dorchester Lodge No. 27 Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
FOP Cambridge–Dorchester Lodge No. 27 Inc. building
(Dorchester County) ...................................................................... 50,000
(EI) Ski Patrol Headquarters. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Wisp Ski Patrol Member of the National Ski
Patrol for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Wisp Ski Patrol Headquarters for
better patient care and modern resources (Garrett County) ....... 100,000
(EJ) Schucks Road Regional Park. Provide a grant to the County
Executive and County Council of Harford County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Schucks Road Regional Park including restroom
facilities to support Miracle League baseball (Harford
County) .......................................................................................... 150,000
(EK) Havre de Grace STAR – Sports Theatre Arts Recreation –
Centre. Provide a grant to the Mayor and City Council of Havre
de Grace for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Havre de Grace STAR – Sports
Theatre Arts Recreation – Centre (Harford County) ................... 150,000
(EL) Maryland Center for the Visual and Performing Arts. Provide a
grant to the Board of Trustees of the Maryland Center for the
Arts for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Maryland Center for the Visual
and Performing Arts including a community amphitheater
(Harford County) .......................................................................... 150,000
– 54 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
(EM) Community Action Council (CAC) of Howard County Route One
Service Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the
Community Action Council of Howard County Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Community Action Council (CAC) of Howard
County Route One Service Center (Howard County) ................... 250,000
(EN) Maryland State Fair. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of The Maryland State Fair & Agricultural Society, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of accessibility and security renovations for the
Maryland State Fair buildings and facilities (Baltimore
County) .......................................................................................... 100,000
(EO) Maryland Deaf Community Center. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the Maryland Deaf Community Center,
Frederick, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Maryland Deaf
Community Center at 720 North East Street, Frederick
(Frederick County) ........................................................................ 1,000,000
(EP) Chesapeake Bay Maritime Museum. Provide a grant to the
Board of Governors of the Chesapeake Bay Maritime Museum
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Chesapeake Bay Maritime Museum
facilities including HVAC system replacement (Talbot
County) .......................................................................................... 250,000
(EQ) SquashWise Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
Baltimore SquashWise, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
SquashWise Center including capital equipment (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................... 50,000
(ER) Bengies Road Sanitary Sewer System Extension. Provide a
grant to the County Executive and County Council of Baltimore
County for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of an extension of the sanitary sewer
system (Baltimore County) ........................................................... 500,000
– 55 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ES) Valley Little League. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of Valley Little League, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Valley Little League facilities (Washington County) ................... 125,000
(ET) Smithsburg High School Field House. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the Smithsburg Athletic Booster Club, Inc.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Smithsburg High School Field House
(Washington County) .................................................................... 400,000
(EU) St. Mary’s County Regional Airport Fuel Capacity Expansion.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of Patuxent
Partnership, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the St. Mary’s County
Regional Airport Fuel Capacity Expansion project (St. Mary’s
County) .......................................................................................... 350,000
(EV) Silver Spring United Methodist Church – Shepherd’s Table
Kitchen Rehabilitation. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Silver Spring United Methodist Church for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Silver Spring United Methodist Church –
Shepherd’s Table Kitchen Rehabilitation project (Montgomery
County) .......................................................................................... 130,000
(EW) Western Montgomery County Pool Bubble. Provide a grant to
the Commissioners of The Town of Poolesville for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of pool bubble to provide year–round recreational
opportunities (Montgomery County) ............................................ 200,000
(EX) St. Anne’s Episcopal Church. Provide a grant to the Senior
Warden and Junior Warden of St. Anne’s Episcopal Church for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of St. Anne’s Episcopal Church Rental
Renovation Project including installing a sprinkler system and
addressing asbestos containment and mold remediation
(Montgomery County) ................................................................... 76,300
– 56 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
(EY) Montgomery County History Center. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of The Montgomery County Historical
Society, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of a Montgomery County History Center
(Montgomery County) ................................................................... 250,000
(EZ) Public Works Facility Renovations – Phase II Design. Provide a
grant to the Mayor and Council of the City of Takoma Park for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Public Works Facility Renovations –
Phase II Design, including energy efficiency upgrades (HVAC,
solar panels), work space expansion, and increased restroom
facilities (Montgomery County) .................................................... 143,000
(FA) American Legion Post No. 171. Provide a grant to the Executive
Committee of the Damascus American Legion Post No. 171 for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the American Legion Post No. 171 property
(Montgomery County) ................................................................... 250,000
(FB) Montgomery Housing Partnership Office at Amherst Wheaton
Arts. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of Montgomery
Housing Partnership, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Montgomery
Housing Partnership Office at Amherst Wheaton Arts
(Montgomery County) ................................................................... 500,000
(FC) Madison Fields. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
Madison House Autism Foundation, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Madison Fields buildings and grounds (Montgomery County) .. 100,000
(FD) Calverton Galway Local Park. Provide a grant to the Board of
Commissioners of the Maryland–National Capital Park and
Planning Commission for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Calverton Galway
Local Park including playground renovation with parking lot
and ADA improvements and SWM (Montgomery County) ......... 125,000
– 57 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(FE) Georgia Avenue Noise Mitigation Fencing Project. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of the Leisure World of Maryland
Corporation for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Georgia Avenue Noise Mitigation
Fencing Project (Montgomery County) ......................................... 150,000
(FF) Girl Scout Camp Brighton Woods. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of the Girl Scout Council of the Nation’s Capital for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Girl Scout Camp Brighton Woods
(Montgomery County) ................................................................... 300,000
400,000
(FG) Elwood Smith Community Center. Provide a grant to the Mayor
and Council of Rockville for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Elwood Smith
Community Center (Montgomery County) ................................... 100,000
150,000
(FH) Dream Catcher Meadows. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of 7th Generation Foundation, Inc. – doing business
as Dream Catcher Meadows for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Dream Catcher Meadows property including a new pole barn to
house animals with a solar array on the roof of the structure for
electricity (Montgomery County) .................................................. 75,000
(FI) Centerway Local Park. Provide a grant to the Board of
Commissioners of the Maryland–National Capital Park and
Planning Commission for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of updated and/or new
park amenities, such as a skate park, and improve accessibility
to the Centerway Local Park property (Montgomery County) ..... 350,000
(FJ) Riverdale Baptist Athletic Complex. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the Riverdale Baptist School, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Riverdale Baptist Athletic Complex (Prince
George’s County) ........................................................................... 150,000
215,000
– 58 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
(FK) MEOR Cultural Center. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of The Maryland Jewish Experience, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the MEOR (“The Maryland Jewish Experience,
Inc.”) property (Prince George’s County) ...................................... 350,000
(FL) Girl Scout Camp Aquasco. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Girl Scout Council of the Nation’s Capital for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Camp Aquasco property (Prince
George’s County) ........................................................................... 100,000
(FM) Town of University Park Town Hall. Provide a grant to the
Mayor and Common Council of University Park for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Town of University Park Town Hall
construction (Prince George’s County) ......................................... 300,000
(FN) Textile Machines for Youth. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of GIMZ Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of textile machines for
hands–on training of youths (Prince George’s County) ............... 130,000
(FO) Laurel Boys and Girls Club. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Laurel Boys and Girls Club, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Laurel Boys and Girls Club property (Prince George’s
County) .......................................................................................... 400,000
(FP) City of Glenarden Public Safety Building. Provide a grant to the
Mayor and City Council of The City of Glenarden for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of a public safety building for the City of Glenarden
(Prince George’s County) .............................................................. 2,000,000
(FQ) Children’s Guild – Support of Safe and Nurturing Homes for
Children with Autism. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of The Children’s Guild for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
– 59 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
improvement, and capital equipping of safe, accessible homes
for children with Autism (Baltimore City) .................................. 250,000
(FR) Hope Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the
Foundation of H.O.P.E., Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
new facility for the Hope Center (Talbot County) ........................ 500,000
(FS) Lyric Foundation Infrastructure Improvements. Provide a
grant to the Lyric Foundation, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Lyric Foundation Infrastructure Improvements (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................... 500,000
(FT) Mid Shore Regional Detention Center. Provide a grant to the
Board of County Commissioners of Queen Anne’s County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Mid Shore Regional Detention Center (Queen
Anne’s County) .............................................................................. 500,000
(FU) Ascension Saint Agnes Family Birthing Center. Provide a grant
to the Board of Directors of the Ascension Saint Agnes Hospital
Foundation for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of a new facility for the Ascension Saint
Agnes Family Birthing Center (Baltimore City) .......................... 250,000
(FV) Forestville Healthcare Center – Expansion. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of the OHI Asset MD Forestville LLC for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Forestville Healthcare Center (Prince
George’s County) ........................................................................... 1,000,000
(FW) Boonsboro Advanced Metering System. Provide a grant to the
Mayor and Council of Boonsboro for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Boonsboro Advanced Metering System (Washington County) .... 125,000
(FX) Boonsboro Crestview Water Pressure Reduction and Bypass.
Provide a grant to the Mayor and Council of Boonsboro for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
– 60 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Boonsboro Crestview Water Pressure Reduction
and Bypass, including installation of a new water main
(Washington County) .................................................................... 125,000
(FY) Williamsport Memorial Library. Provide a grant to the Mayor
and Council of The Town of Williamsport for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Williamsport Memorial Library (Washington County) ............... 400,000
(FZ) Meritus Commons. Provide a grant to Meritus Health for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Meritus Commons (Washington County) ......... 750,000
(GA) Bright & Joyful Future Campaign. Provide a grant to the Board
of Trustees of the Connelly School of the Holy Child for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Bright & Joyful Future Campaign, including
the main building (Montgomery County) .................................... 500,000
(GB) Carpenters Baltimore Revitalization Initiative (Baltimore City
Carpenters Training Center). Provide a grant to the Eastern
Atlantic States Regional Council of Carpenters for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Carpenters Baltimore Revitalization Initiative
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ 750,000
(GC) Jug Handle Connector. Provide a grant to the County Executive
and County Council of Howard County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Route 29 North–South Jug Handle Connector (Howard
County) .......................................................................................... 2,000,000
(GD) Educational Enhancement of Holocaust Memorial. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of the Baltimore Jewish Council
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Educational Enhancement of the
Holocaust Memorial (Baltimore City) .......................................... 250,000
750,000
– 61 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(GE) Mount Vernon Place Conservancy. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of the Mount Vernon Place Conservancy, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Baltimore’s Washington Monument and the
surrounding squares of Mount Vernon Place (Baltimore City)... 400,000
(GF) Enoch Pratt Free Library System. Provide a grant to the Board
of Trustees and Directors of the Enoch Pratt Free Library
System for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of infrastructure improvements to
facilities in the Enoch Pratt Free Library System (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................... 1,000,000
(GG) Helping Up Mission. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of the Helping Up Mission, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Helping Up Mission facility, including a recovery park
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ 100,000
(GH) Clay Hill Public Charter School. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of the Patterson Park Public Charter School, Inc.
Bluebird Education Network, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of Clay
Hill Public Charter School (Baltimore City) ............................... 1,500,000
(GI) Fair Hill Training Center. Provide a grant to the Fair Hill
Condominium Association for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Fair Hill Training Center (Cecil County) .................................... 1,000,000
(GJ) Baltimore Symphony Orchestra. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of the Baltimore Symphony Orchestra Endowment
Trust for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Joseph Meyerhoff Symphony Hall
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ 750,000
(GK) NorthBay Environmental Education Center. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of NorthBay Education, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
– 62 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
equipping of NorthBay facilities (Cecil County) .......................... 375,000
(GL) Ashley Addiction Treatment – Patient Room Renovations.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of Ashley Addiction
Treatment for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Ashley Addiction Treatment
property (Harford County) ........................................................... 250,000
(GM) St. Michaels Community Center. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of St. Michaels Community Center, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of infrastructure improvements of the St. Michaels
Community Center project (Talbot County) ................................. 100,000
(GN) Allegany Museum Restoration Project. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the Allegany Museum, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Allegany Museum (Allegany County) ............... 100,000
(GO) Kingdom Cares Center. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Kingdom Global Community Development
Corporation (KGCDC) for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Kingdom Cares
Center (Prince George’s County) ................................................... 500,000
(GP) Northwest Branch Recreation Pool House. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of the Northwest Branch Recreation, Inc.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Northwest Branch Recreation facility,
including accessibility improvements (Montgomery County) ..... 1,000,000
(GQ) Don Bosco Cristo Rey Gymnasium. Provide a grant to the
Auxiliary Board of the Don Bosco Cristo Rey High School for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Don Bosco Cristo Rey High School
facility, including construction of a gymnasium (Montgomery
County) .......................................................................................... 1,000,000
(GR) Johns Hopkins Hospital. Provide a grant to the Johns Hopkins
University for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
– 63 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Pediatric Emergency Department
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ 478,000
(GS) Adventist Healthcare Shady Grove Medical Center. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of Adventist Healthcare, Inc.,
d.b.a. Adventist Healthcare Shady Grove Medical Center for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Adventist Healthcare Shady Grove Medical Center
including a new care tower (Montgomery County) ...................... 250,000
(GT) Catonsville Hub Renovations. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Sheppard Pratt Health System, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Catonsville Hub (Baltimore County) ................ 300,000
(GU) Sheppard Pratt – Towson Hospital Infrastructure. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of the Sheppard Pratt Health
System, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of Towson Hospital infrastructure
improvements (Baltimore County) ............................................... 1,000,000
(GV) Principio Rail Spur. Provide a grant to the Maryland Economic
Development Corporation for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the development of a rail
spur to service a calcined clay plant (Cecil County) .................... 1,500,000
(GW) Damascus Heritage Society Museum. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of The Damascus Heritage Society for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Damascus Heritage Society Museum
(Montgomery County) ................................................................... 100,000
(GX) Linwood Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the
Linwood Center, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Linwood Center
(Howard County) .......................................................................... 336,377
(GY) Pascal Crisis Stabilization Center – Southern Maryland.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of Pascal Crisis
– 64 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
Services, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of a new crisis center in
Southern Maryland (St. Mary’s County) ..................................... 500,000
(GZ) Diversion Center Walk–In Support Renovation Project. Provide
a grant to the County Executive and County Council of
Montgomery County for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Diversion Center
Walk–In Support Renovation Project (Montgomery County) ...... 500,000
(HA) Sandy Spring Museum Library. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Sandy Spring Museum for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Sandy Spring Museum Library (Montgomery County) .............. 200,000
(HB) The Diener School Inc. Provide a grant to the Board of Trustees
of The Diener School Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Americans with
Disabilities Act access improvements at The Diener School Inc.
(Montgomery County) ................................................................... 400,000
(HC) BioHub Maryland. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
Maryland Tech Council for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the BioHub Maryland
facility, including laboratory equipment (Montgomery
County) .......................................................................................... 500,000
(HD) UPMC Western Maryland Radiation Therapy Linear
Accelerator. Provide a grant to UPMC Western Maryland for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the UPMC Western Maryland Radiation Therapy
Linear Accelerator project (Allegany County) .............................. 500,000
(HE) Annapolis Maritime Museum Securing the Weems and Plath
Building. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of Annapolis
Maritime Museum, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Annapolis Maritime
Museum Securing the Weems and Plath Building project (Anne
Arundel County) ........................................................................... 100,000
– 65 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(HF) Children’s Guild Preschool Playground at Monarch Academy
Annapolis. Provide a grant to The Children’s Guild, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Children’s Guild Preschool Playground at
Monarch Academy Annapolis (Anne Arundel County) ............... 200,000
(HG) Frederick County Microgrid. Provide a grant to the County
Executive and County Council of Frederick County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Frederick County Microgrid (Frederick
County) .......................................................................................... 500,000
(HH) Boys and Girls Club of Southern Maryland – Waldorf Club
Park. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of The Boys and
Girls Clubs of Southern Maryland, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of Boys
and Girls Club of Southern Maryland – Waldorf Club Park
(Charles County) ........................................................................... 400,000
(HI) UA Local 486 Training School. Provide a grant to the Plumbers
and Steamfitters Local Union No. 486 Joint Journeymen and
Apprentice Training Fund for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of UA Local 486 Training
School (Baltimore County) ........................................................... 250,000
(HJ) Howard County Conservancy Playground. Provide a grant to
The Howard County Conservancy, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Howard County Conservancy Playground (Howard County) ..... 400,000
(HK) Chesapeake Shakespeare Company Theatre Revitalization.
Provide a grant to the Chesapeake Shakespeare Company for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Chesapeake Shakespeare Company
Theatre Revitalization project (Baltimore City) .......................... 200,000
(HL) Friends of Patapsco Valley State Park Whiting Property Capital
Improvements. Provide a grant to the Friends of Patapsco
Valley State Park for the acquisition, planning, design,
– 66 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Friends of Patapsco
Valley State Park Whiting Property Capital Improvements
(Baltimore County) ....................................................................... 425,000
(HM) Poiema Group Housing. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Poiema Movement, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Poiema Group Housing (Charles County) ................................... 650,000
(HN) District Heights Police Station. Provide a grant to the Mayor
and Commissioners of the City of District Heights for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the District Heights police station (Prince George’s
County) .......................................................................................... 50,000
180,000
(HO) Prince George’s Gateway Development Authority. Provide a
grant to the Prince George’s Gateway Development Authority for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of neighborhood revitalization projects in
target areas of the Prince George’s Gateway Development
Authority (Prince George’s County) .............................................. 500,000
(HP) Frederick Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
The Frederick Center, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Frederick Center
(Frederick County) ........................................................................ 150,000
125,000
(HQ) Potomac High School. Provide a grant to Prince George’s
County Public Schools for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Potomac High School
(Prince George’s County) .............................................................. 100,000
(HR) iHomes. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of iHomes,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of properties to provide housing (Harford
County) .......................................................................................... 200,000
– 67 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(HS) Patsy Huson Park. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
the Montgomery Village Foundation, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Patsy Huson Park, including a playground and walking paths
(Montgomery County) ................................................................... 500,000
(HT) Diamond Foundation of Prince George’s County. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of the Diamond Foundation of
Prince George’s County, Inc for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Diamond Foundation of Prince George’s County property
(Prince George’s County) .............................................................. 100,000
147,823
(HU) Creative Suitland Arts Center. Provide a grant to the World
Arts Focus, Inc. dba Joe’s Movement Emporium for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Creative Suitland Arts Center (Prince George’s
County) .......................................................................................... 300,000
170,000
(HV) Forest Heights Boys and Girls Club. Provide a grant to the
Prince George’s County Boys and Girls Club, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Forest Heights Boys and Girls Club (Prince
George’s County) ........................................................................... 450,000
(HW) Route 108 Crosswalks. Provide a grant to Montgomery County,
Maryland and the State Highway Administration for planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
crosswalks on Route 108 in Montgomery County (Montgomery
County) .......................................................................................... 120,000
(HX) Riverworks Art Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of Riverworks Art Center, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Riverworks Art Center property (Montgomery County) ............... 250,000
(HY) Springsong Museum. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of the Rachel Carson Place of Wonder Inc. for the acquisition,
– 68 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Springsong Museum (Montgomery County) ................................ 200,000
(HZ) Montgomery County Local Public School Playgrounds. Provide
a grant to Montgomery County, Maryland for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of local
public school playgrounds (Montgomery County) ....................... 1,550,000
(IA) Muslim Community Center. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of The Muslim Community Center, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Muslim Community Center, including
community kitchen (Montgomery County) ................................... 30,000
(IB) Blackrock Center for the Arts. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of the Germantown Cultural Arts Center, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Blackrock Center for the Arts (Montgomery
County) .......................................................................................... 250,000
(IC) Gaithersburg Municipal Complex. Provide a grant to the Mayor
and the City Council for the City of Gaithersburg for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of a new municipal complex and city facilities
(Montgomery County) ................................................................... 100,000
200,000
(ID) Green Towson Alliance. Provide a grant to the Green Towson
Alliance the Board of Directors of NeighborSpace of Baltimore
County for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of open spaces and infrastructure
(Baltimore County) ....................................................................... 50,000
70,000
(IE) Olney Farmers and Artist Market. Provide a grant to the
Friends of the Olney Farmers Market for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Olney Farmers and Artist Market, including storage units
(Montgomery County) ................................................................... 5,000
– 69 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(IF) Sherwood High School Softball Field. Provide a grant to the
County Executive and County Council of Montgomery County
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Sherwood High School, including a
softball field (Montgomery County) ............................................ 686,000
(IG) Earleigh Heights New Fire Station. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the Earleigh Heights Volunteer Fire
Company of Anne Arundel County for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Earleigh Heights New Fire Station, including transport units
(Anne Arundel County) ................................................................. 120,000
(IH) Solo Gibbs Recreation Center. Provide a grant to the Baltimore
City Department of Recreation and Parks for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Solo Gibbs Recreation Center (Baltimore City) ........................... 1,000,000
(II) Garrett Park Town Hall. Provide a grant to the Mayor and
Council of the Town of Garrett Park for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Garrett Park Town Hall (Montgomery County) .......................... 500,000
(IJ) Drink at the Well, Inc. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of Drink at the Well, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Drink at the Well,
Inc. property (Baltimore City) ...................................................... 100,000
(IK) Cross Street Market Improvements. Provide a grant to the
Baltimore Public Markets Corporation for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Cross Street Market Improvements project (Baltimore City) ...... 500,000
(IL) Worcester County Fire Training Tower. Provide a grant to the
Board of County Commissioners of Worcester County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Worcester County fire training tower (Worcester
County) .......................................................................................... 250,000
– 70 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
(IM) Arc Central Chesapeake Region – Linthicum. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of The Arc Central Chesapeake Region
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of The Arc Central Chesapeake Region –
Linthicum facilities (Anne Arundel County) ............................... 175,000
(IN) Summit School Building Expansion. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of The Summit School for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of The
Summit School (Anne Arundel County) ...................................... 250,000
(IO) Maryland State Boychoir Center for the Arts. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of the Maryland State Boychoir, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Maryland State Boychoir Center for the
Arts including accessibility improvements (Baltimore City) ...... 25,000
(IP) South Baltimore Little League. Provide a grant to South
Baltimore Little League, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
athletic fields, lighting, and related facilities (Baltimore City) .. 200,000
(IQ) Walther Apartments Affordable Housing Redevelopment.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of Govans Ecumenical
Development Corporation (GEDCO) for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Walther Apartments Affordable Housing Redevelopment project
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ 100,000
(IR) Margaret–Bennett Homes. Provide a grant to The Women’s
Housing Coalition, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Margaret–Bennett
Homes property (Baltimore City) ................................................. 75,000
(IS) York Road Commercial Corridor. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of the York Corridor Business Improvement District
Management Authority for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the York Road
– 71 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
commercial corridor neighborhood signage and pedestrian
safety infrastructure project (Baltimore City) .............................. 175,000
100,000
(IT) Belvedere Improvement Association. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the Belvedere Improvement Association,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Belvedere Improvement
Association for infrastructure development (Baltimore City) ..... 125,000
150,000
(IU) Canton Helipad. Provide a grant to the Mayor and City Council
of Baltimore for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of a Baltimore City and Port of Maryland
Aviation and First Responders Station (Baltimore City) ............ 750,000
(IV) Perry Hall High School Track. Provide a grant to Baltimore
County Public Schools for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Perry Hall High
School Track (Baltimore County) ................................................ 600,000
(IW) Renaissance Park. Provide a grant to the County Executive and
County Council of Baltimore County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Renaissance Park (Baltimore County) ......................................... 100,000
(IX) St. Pius X Property. Provide a grant to the Board of Financial
Administration of the Archdiocese of Baltimore for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the St. Pius X property and field space (Baltimore
County) .......................................................................................... 500,000
(IY) Mount Airy Police Department. Provide a grant to the Mount
Airy Police Department for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of a new police station for
the Mount Airy Police Department (Carroll County) .................. 100,000
(IZ) American Film Institute. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of the American Film Institute, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
– 72 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
American Film Institute (Montgomery County) .......................... 300,000
(JA) Child Care Playground Renovation and Replacement. Provide
a grant to the County Executive and County Council of
Montgomery County for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of playgrounds at County
child care facilities (Montgomery County) ................................... 850,000
(JB) Noyes Library for Young Children. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of the Noyes Children’s Library Foundation, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Noyes Library for Young Children
(Montgomery County) ................................................................... 1,000,000
(JC) The Seina School. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
The Siena School for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of The Seina School
(Montgomery County) ................................................................... 500,000
(JD) Laytonsville District Volunteer Fire Station. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of Laytonsville District Volunteer Fire
Department, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Laytonsville District
Volunteer Fire Station (Montgomery County) ............................. 100,000
(JE) Salem United Methodist Church. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of the Salem United Methodist Church for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Salem United Methodist Church (Montgomery
County) .......................................................................................... 150,000
(JF) Friends House Retirement Community. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the Friends House Retirement
Community, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Friends House
Retirement Community project (Montgomery County) ................ 100,000
(JG) Sandy Spring Volunteer Fire Department. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of the Sandy Spring Volunteer Fire
– 73 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Department, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Sandy Spring Volunteer
Fire Department, including Station 40 outbuilding
(Montgomery County) ................................................................... 100,000
(JH) Harmony 360. Provide a grant to the Debre Bisrat Dagmawi
Kulibi St. Gabriel Ethiopian Orthodox Tewahed Church for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of a property to convert into community space
(Montgomery County) ................................................................... 25,000
(JI) Rotary Club of Olney. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of The Rotary Club of Olney, Maryland, Incorporated for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Rotary Club of Olney property including an
LED sign at the southeast corner of Route 10 and Route 97 for
the Greater Olney area residents (Montgomery County) ............. 50,000
(JJ) Olney Mill House. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
the Olney Mill Community Association, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
historic Olney Mill House property (Montgomery County) ......... 100,000
172,000
(JK) Preschool Education Center. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Maryland Turkish American Inhabitants, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of a Preschool Education Center (Howard
County) .......................................................................................... 120,000
370,000
(JL) University of Maryland Baltimore Washington Medical Center.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the University of
Maryland Baltimore Washington Medical Center, Inc. to assist
in the design, construction, expansion, and equipping of the
Medical Treatment Oncology Center (Anne Arundel County)..... 500,000
(JM) Baltimore County Arts Guild. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Baltimore County Arts Guild for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
– 74 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
Baltimore County Arts Guild (Baltimore County) ....................... 150,000
(JN) Infant and Toddlers Facility. Provide a grant to the County
Executive and County Council of Montgomery County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Infant and Toddlers facility (Montgomery
County) .......................................................................................... 200,000
(JO) Choice Neighborhood Initiative. Provide a grant to the Mayor
and Aldermen/Alderwomen of the City of Annapolis for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Eastport Terrace and Harbor House redevelopment
(Anne Arundel County) ................................................................. 500,000
(JP) Annapolis Middle School. Provide a grant to the County
Executive and County Council of Anne Arundel County and the
Board of Education of Anne Arundel County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Annapolis Middle School, including field lights (Anne Arundel
County) .......................................................................................... 500,000
(JQ) Southwest Visions Foundation LLC. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of Southwest Visions Foundation LLC for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Southwest Visions Foundation LLC facility
(Baltimore County) ...................................................................... 100,000
(JR) Windsor Mill Support Home. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Spectrum Support, Incorporated for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
Windsor Mill Support Home property (Baltimore County) ........ 150,000
(JS) Boys and Girls Clubs. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of the Maryland Alliance of Boys and Girls Clubs for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Boys and Girls Clubs facilities (Statewide) ........... 500,000
(JT) Liberty Sports Park. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
Green Branch Management Group Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
– 75 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Liberty Sports Park including parking lot expansion (Prince
George’s County) .......................................................................... 250,000
(JU) Kent County Public Schools. Provide a grant to Kent County,
Maryland to fund the design, construction, and capital
equipping of public school buildings and public school capital
improvements (Kent County) ........................................................ 150,000
(JV) Upper Bay Counseling and Support Services. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of Upper Bay Counseling & Support
Services, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Upper Bay Counseling & Support
Services building, including new kitchen facilities (Harford
County) .......................................................................................... 100,000
(JW) United States Bomb Technician Association – Maryland
Technology Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
the United States Bomb Technician Association (USBTA) for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the final Phase 3 buildout of the MD Technology
Center, a 30,000 sq. foot facility used for research, testing, and
innovation in energetics and public safety that is operated by the
United States Bomb Technician Association (Charles County) .. 150,000
(JX) Hope Garden at Community Learning Center – CLC. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of the Islamic Society of
Baltimore, Maryland, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Hope Garden at
Community Learning Center – CLC, a multigenerational
wellness greenspace that will enhance the well–being of
community members while providing a gathering space for all
ages and abilities (Baltimore County) ........................................... 50,000
(JY) Edmondson Heights Elementary School Playground. Provide a
grant to the Board of Education of Baltimore County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Edmondson Heights Elementary School facilities
and playground (Baltimore County) ............................................ .. 50,000
(JZ) Safety and Security for Survivors of Power–Based Violence
Station North. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
– 76 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
TurnAround, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of multiple Safety and
Security for Survivors of Power–Based Violence satellite locations
to ensure safety and security for those dealing with intimate
partner violence, sexual violence, and human trafficking
(Baltimore City) .............................................................................. 45,000
(KA) Greenway Trail. Provide a grant to Baltimore City for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Greenway Trail (Baltimore City) ........................ 1,500,000
(KB) OASIS – Farming Diversification and Capacity Improvement.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the Organization for
Advancement of and Service for Individuals with Special Needs
(OASIS), Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of farming diversification and capacity
improvement to serve more special needs participants
(Montgomery County) .................................................................... 128,000
(KC) Catonsville Rails to Trails. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Catonsville Rails to Trails, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of bike
and hike trails (Baltimore County) ................................................ 250,000
(KD) Irvine Nature Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of the Irvine Nature Center for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Irvine Nature Center
facilities (Baltimore County) .......................................................... 100,000
(KE) Housing Opportunities Commission. Provide a grant to the
Housing Opportunities Commission of Montgomery County for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of soccer field improvements at Cider Mill Apartments
(Montgomery County) .................................................................... 65,000
(KF) Gallagher Mansion. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
Gallagher Mansion, Inc. c/o Govans Ecumenical Development
Corporation for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Gallagher Mansion property
– 77 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. 50,000
(KG) Splash Point at Baker Park. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of The Community Foundation of Frederick County,
Maryland, Inc for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Splash Point
interactive splash pad at Baker Park (Frederick County) .......... 25,000
(KH) St. Mary’s County Family YMCA. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of YMCA of the Chesapeake, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of St.
Mary’s County Family YMCA (St. Mary’s County) ..................... 75,000
ZA01 MARYLAND HOSPITAL ASSOCIATION
(A) Atlantic General Hospital. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of Atlantic General Hospital Corporation to assist in
the design, construction, renovation, and equipping of the
Central Sterile Processing Department, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act,
the matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Worcester County) ............................. 79,000
(B) Brook Lane Health Services. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Brook Lane Health Services, Inc. to assist in the
design, construction, and equipping of a new therapeutic
recreational facility on the campus of Brook Lane, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act,
the matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Washington County) .......................... 2,979,000
(C) CalvertHealth Medical Center. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of CalvertHealth Medical Center, Inc. to assist in the
design, construction, renovation, and equipping of the labor
and delivery area of the Family Birth Center, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act,
the matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Calvert County) ................................. 3,972,000
(D) Carroll Hospital Center. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Carroll Hospital Center, Inc. to assist in the design,
– 78 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
construction, expansion, renovation, and equipping of the
Emergency Department, subject to the requirement that the
grantee provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act (Carroll County) .................................................................... 887,000
(E) Frederick Health Hospital. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Frederick Health Hospital, Inc. to assist in the
design, construction, renovation, and equipping of its operating
suite, subject to the requirement that the grantee provide an
equal and matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding
Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of funds
expended prior to the effective date of this Act (Frederick
County) ........................................................................................ 100,000
(F) Greater Baltimore Medical Center. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of Greater Baltimore Medical Center, Inc.
for the design, construction, renovation, and equipping of the
Radiation Oncology Center, subject to the requirement that the
grantee provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act (Baltimore County) ............................................................... 1,280,000
(G) Howard County General Hospital. Provide a grant to the Board
of Trustees of Howard County General Hospital, Inc. for the
design, construction, expansion, renovation, and equipping of
the Observation Service Unit, subject to the requirement that
the grantee provide an equal and matching fund for this
purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the
matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Howard County) ................................ 733,000
(H) Kennedy Krieger Children’s Hospital. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of Kennedy Krieger Children’s Hospital, Inc.
to assist in the design, construction, renovation, and equipping
of the Inpatient Specialty Rehabilitation Unit, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act,
the matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Baltimore City) .................................. 4,000,000
(I) MedStar Southern Maryland Hospital Center. Provide a grant
to the Board of Directors of MedStar Southern Maryland
Hospital Center, Inc. to assist in the design, construction,
– 79 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
expansion, renovation, and equipping of the urology suite and
an operating room, subject to the requirement that the grantee
provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act (Prince George’s County) ...................................................... 100,000
(J) Mercy Medical Center. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Mercy Medical Center, Inc. to assist in the design,
construction, renovation, and equipping of its facilities to
collocate and expand primary care space on the Mercy Medical
Center campus, subject to the requirement that the grantee
provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act (Baltimore City) .................................................................... 1,931,000
(K) Montgomery General Hospital MedStar Montgomery Medical
Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
Montgomery General Hospital, Inc. d/b/a MedStar
Montgomery Medical Center to assist in the design,
construction, renovation, and equipping of the behavioral
health inpatient facilities at MedStar Montgomery Medical
Center’s Addiction and Mental Health Center, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act,
the matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Montgomery County) ......................... 100,000
(L) Northwest Hospital Center. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Northwest Hospital Center, Inc. to assist in the
design, construction, renovation, and equipping of the
Emergency Department, subject to the requirement that the
grantee provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act (Baltimore County) ............................................................... 90,000
(M) St. Agnes Healthcare. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of St. Agnes Healthcare, Inc. to assist in the design,
construction, renovation, and equipping of the Family Birthing
Center, subject to the requirement that the grantee provide an
equal and matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding
Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of funds
expended prior to the effective date of this Act (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 1,986,000
– 80 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
(N) Sheppard Pratt Health System. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of Sheppard Pratt Health System, Inc. to assist in the
design, construction, renovation, and equipping of the
Adolescent Neuropsychiatric Unit on the Towson campus,
subject to the requirement that the grantee provide an equal
and matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section
1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of funds
expended prior to the effective date of this Act (Baltimore
County) ........................................................................................ 185,000
(O) Sheppard Pratt Health System. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of Sheppard Pratt Health System, Inc. to assist in the
design, construction, renovation, and equipping of the Adult
Neuropsychiatric Unit on the Towson campus, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act,
the matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Baltimore County) ............................. 79,000
(P) Sheppard Pratt Health System. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of Sheppard Pratt Health System, Inc. to assist in the
design, construction, renovation, and equipping of the Day
Hospitals on the Towson campus, subject to the requirement
that the grantee provide an equal and matching fund for this
purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the
matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Baltimore County) ............................. 97,000
(Q) Sinai Hospital of Baltimore. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Sinai Hospital of Baltimore, Inc. to assist in the
design, construction, renovation, and equipping of the Women’s
and Children’s Department, subject to the requirement that
the grantee provide an equal and matching fund for this
purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the
matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Baltimore City) .................................. 393,000
(R) The Children’s Inn at the National Institutes of Health.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of Children’s Inn at
NIH, Inc. to assist in the design, construction, and equipping of
renovations of a new community kitchen and dining lounge at
The Children’s Inn at NIH, subject to the requirement that the
grantee provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
– 81 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Act (Montgomery County) ........................................................... 208,000
(S) The Johns Hopkins Hospital. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of The Johns Hopkins Hospital to assist in the design,
construction, expansion, renovation, and equipping of the
Pediatric Emergency Department Psychiatric Unit, subject to
the requirement that the grantee provide an equal and
matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5)
of this Act, the matching fund may consist of funds expended
prior to the effective date of this Act (Baltimore City) .............. 172,000
(T) TidalHealth Peninsula Regional. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of TidalHealth Peninsula Regional, Inc. to assist in
the design, construction, renovation, and equipping of a new
Family Medicine Residency Clinic, subject to the requirement
that the grantee provide an equal and matching fund for this
purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the
matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Wicomico County) .............................. 2,226,000
(U) University of Maryland Baltimore Washington Medical Center.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the University of
Maryland Baltimore Washington Medical Center, Inc. to assist
in the design, construction, and equipping of a dedicated
forensic nursing treatment zone in the University of Maryland
Baltimore Washington Medical Center’s Emergency
Department subject to the requirement that the grantee
provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act (Anne Arundel County).......................................................... 106,000
(V) University of Maryland Upper Chesapeake Medical Center.
Health System, Inc. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
the University of Maryland Upper Chesapeake Medical Center,
Inc. to assist in the design, construction, renovation, and
equipping of the Primary Care Clinic, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act,
the matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Harford County) ................................ 973,000
ZA02 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(Statewide)
(A) Legislative Initiatives. Provide funds for projects of political
– 82 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
subdivisions and nonprofit organizations .................................. 25,000,000
(A) University of Pittsburgh Medical Center Western Maryland –
Radiation Therapy Linear Accelerator. Provide a grant to the
Board of Trustees of the University of Pittsburgh Medical
Center for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the University of
Pittsburgh Medical Center Western Maryland including a
Radiation Therapy Linear Accelerator (Allegany County) ........ 100,000
(B) American Legion Post No. 7 – Guy C. Parlett. Provide a grant
to the Officers of the Guy C. Parlett Post No. 7, American
Legion, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Guy C. Parlett
American Legion Post No. 7 (Anne Arundel County) ................ 50,000
(C) Arundel High School Marquee. Provide a grant to the Board of
Education of Anne Arundel County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Arundel High School including a new electronic marquee sign
and associated infrastructure (Anne Arundel County) ............. 14,500
(D) Arundel Middle School Marquee. Provide a grant to the Board
of Education of Anne Arundel County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Arundel Middle School including a new electronic marquee
sign and associated infrastructure (Anne Arundel County) ...... 14,500
(E) Baltimore–Washington International Thurgood Marshall
Airport Storefront – Visitor Experience. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of Visit Annapolis & Anne Arundel County,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of a new visitor focused
storefront and information center at BWI Marshall Airport
(Anne Arundel County) ............................................................... 50,000
(F) Gambrills Odenton Recreation Council Park Scoreboard.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the
Gambrills–Odenton Recreation Council, Inc for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
– 83 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
scoreboard at Gambrills Odenton Recreation Council Park
(Anne Arundel County) ............................................................... 50,000
(G) Growing Our Reach – Turning Children’s Theatre of Annapolis
into an Art Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
the Children’s Theatre of Annapolis, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Children’s Theatre of Annapolis, Inc. property (Anne Arundel
County) ........................................................................................ 100,000
(H) Harness Creek Overlook Pond Retrofit. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of Arundel Rivers Federation, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Harness Creek Overlook stormwater pond
retrofit project (Anne Arundel County) ...................................... 175,000
(I) Maryland City Volunteer Fire Department. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of the Maryland City Volunteer Fire
Department and Rescue Squad, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Maryland City Volunteer Fire Department including
replacement of the awning covers on the three existing
entrances (Anne Arundel County) .............................................. 6,000
(J) Peerless Rens Club Outdoor Restoration. Provide a grant to the
Board of Trustees of the Peerless Rens Club, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Peerless Rens Club Outdoor Restoration
project (Anne Arundel County) ................................................... 40,000
(K) Summit School Building Expansion. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the Human Development Corporation TA
The Summit School for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of a new seminar and
symposium space for middle school students which will also
provide community testing/tutoring space for Summit
Resource Center (Anne Arundel County) ................................... 150,000
(L) Thomas Point Shoal Lighthouse. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of the United States Lighthouse Society, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
– 84 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Thomas Point Shoal Lighthouse
including replacement of the landing dock (Anne Arundel
County) ........................................................................................ 60,000
(M) Zero Waste to Zero Hunger Facility. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of 4MyCiTy Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Zero Waste to Zero Hunger Facility (Anne Arundel County) .... 20,000
(N) Baltimore Museum of Industry. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of the Baltimore Museum of Industry, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Baltimore Museum of Industry, specifically
the Hercules Building restoration (Baltimore City) .................. 100,000
(O) Conscious Head Barber and Bootcamp Reboot. Provide a grant
to the Officers of Solvivaz Nation LLC for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Conscious Head Barber and Bootcamp Reboot property
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 75,000
(P) East Baltimore Lodge No. 1043. Provide a grant to the East
Baltimore Lodge No. 1043 I.B.P.O.E. of W., Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the East Baltimore Lodge No. 1043 restoration
project including safety and facility improvements (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................. 150,000
(Q) Entrepreneurs Helping Entrepreneurs Facility. Provide a
grant to the Officers of Bendow Benbow Concession Services
LLC for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Entrepreneurs
Helping Entrepreneurs facility (Baltimore City) ....................... 37,500
(R) Forest Park Renaissance. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the WBC Community Development Corporation
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of blighted residential and commercial
properties on and around the business center at the
– 85 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
intersection of Liberty Heights and Garrison Blvd. including
two shovel ready projects: Forest Park Gateway Center located
at 3901 Liberty Heights and a recently acquired lot located at
3403 Garrison Blvd. (Baltimore City) ........................................ 400,000
(S) Gallagher Mansion. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of Gallagher Mansion, Inc. c/o Govans Ecumenical
Development Corporation for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Gallagher
Mansion property (Baltimore City) ............................................ 200,000
(T) Garrett–Jacobs Mansion. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of The Garrett–Jacobs Mansion Endowment Fund,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Garrett–Jacobs
Mansion including roof and skylights replacement and floors
repairs (Baltimore City) .............................................................. 50,000
(U) Gatehouse Renovation Project. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Forest Park Action Council, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Gatehouse on the campus of the University of
Maryland Rehabilitation and Orthopaedic Institute (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................. 25,000
(V) Ivy and Pearls for Excellence. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Ivy & Pearls for Excellence, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Ivy & Pearls for Excellence property (Baltimore City) .............. 270,000
(W) Loyola School. Provide a grant to the Board of Trustees of The
Loyola School, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of The Loyola School
including added security, handicap access, and community art
gallery space (Baltimore City) .................................................... 80,000
(X) Safety and Security for Survivors of Power–Based Violence
Station North. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
TurnAround, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of multiple Safety and
– 86 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
Security for Survivors of Power–Based Violence satellite
locations to ensure safety and security for those dealing with
intimate partner violence, sexual violence, and human
trafficking (Baltimore City) ........................................................ 25,000
(Y) Sinclair Lane Elementary School. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of KABOOM! for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of Sinclair Lane
Elementary School including playground renovation
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 80,000
(Z) South Baltimore Adult High School. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the Cherry Hill Development Corporation
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the South Baltimore Adult High School,
specifically including the predevelopment cost (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................. 100,000
(AA) Thomas Johnson Elementary–Middle School. Provide a grant
to the Board of Directors of KABOOM! for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Thomas Johnson Elementary/Middle School with playground
renovation including a new, inclusive, and engaging play space
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 50,000
(AB) Baltimore Humane Society. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Humane Society of Baltimore County, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Baltimore Humane Society property,
including expansion (Baltimore County) .................................... 250,000
(AC) Calico Cat Cafe. Provide a grant to the Advisory Board of the
Friends of Larchmont, Incorporated for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
transformation of a vacant property into a community cafe and
gathering space (Baltimore County) ........................................... 50,000
(AD) Elmwood Elementary School. Provide a grant to the Board of
Education of Baltimore County for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
– 87 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Elmwood Elementary School including ADA accessibility, and
capital equipping of playgrounds and other facility
improvements (Baltimore County) ............................................. 200,000
(AE) Fullerton Elementary School Playground. Provide a grant to
the Baltimore County Board of Education for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Fullerton Elementary School Playground (Baltimore
County) ........................................................................................ 150,000
(AF) Golden Ring Park Multipurpose Court. Provide a grant to the
County Executive and County Council of Baltimore County for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of multipurpose courts and related
infrastructure at Golden Ring Park (Baltimore County) .......... 250,000
(AG) Idlewylde Community Hall. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of The Idlewylde Improvement Association, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Idlewylde Community Hall (Baltimore
County) ........................................................................................ 100,000
(AH) Kesser Torah Community Recreation Center. Provide a grant
to the Board of Directors of Mesivta Kesser Torah of Baltimore
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Kesser Torah
Community Recreation Center (Baltimore County) .................. 200,000
(AI) Maryland Troopers Association Headquarters. Provide a grant
to the Board of Directors of the Maryland Troopers Association,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Maryland Troopers
Association Headquarters property, including foundation and
basement repairs and renovation (Baltimore County) .............. 100,000
(AJ) Mt. Pleasant AMEC Grave Restoration. Provide a grant to the
Board of Trustees of Mt. Pleasant African Methodist Episcopal
Church, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Mt. Pleasant AMEC
Gravesite (Baltimore County) ..................................................... 34,000
– 88 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
(AK) National Center on Institutions and Alternatives Home
Improvement. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the
National Center on Institutions and Alternatives, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of 14 National Center on Institutions and
Alternatives homes in District 10 for home improvements and
accessibility (Baltimore County) ................................................. 250,000
(AL) Pot Spring Elementary School. Provide a grant to the Board of
Education of Baltimore County for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of an
electronic sign and other facility improvements at Pot Spring
Elementary School (Baltimore County)...................................... 85,000
(AM) Springdale Swim Club. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Springdale Club, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Springdale Swim Club facilities (Baltimore County) ................ 100,000
(AN) Mount Airy Flat Iron Building. Provide a grant to the Mayor
and Council of Mount Airy for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Mount Airy Flat
Iron Building (Carroll County) ................................................... 70,500
(AO) Charles County Food Rescue Program. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the Charles County Charitable Trust, Inc.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Phase 1 providing a new food storage
location including the purchase and installation of a
commercial refrigerator and freezer assets for the county
(Charles County) ......................................................................... 75,000
(AP) Providence of Maryland. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Providence of Maryland Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of six
homes for people with intellectual and developmental
disabilities in Waldorf (Charles County) .................................... 122,000
(AQ) United States Bomb Technician Association – Maryland
– 89 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Technology Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
the United States Bomb Technician Association (USBTA) for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the final Phase 3 buildout of the MD
Technology Center, a 30,000 sq. foot facility used for research,
testing, and innovation in energetics and public safety that is
operated by the United States Bomb Technician Association
(Charles County) ......................................................................... 50,000
(AR) W.A.C. Hughes Lodge No. 1053. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of the W.A.C. Hughes Lodge 1053 for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the W.A.C. Hughes Lodge No. 1053 (Charles
County) ........................................................................................ 75,000
(AS) Waldorf Elks Lodge No. 2421. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Benevolent & Protective Order of the Elks of
the USA, Waldorf 2421 Corp., Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Waldorf Elks Lodge No. 2421 building and facilities (Charles
County) ........................................................................................ 75,000
(AT) AARCH Society – African American Resources–Cultural and
Heritage Society. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
The African American Resources–Cultural and Heritage
Society for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of an African American
Heritage Center including exhibits, media, multipurpose
program space, theatre/meeting space, and research/resource
center (Frederick County) ........................................................... 150,000
(AU) Federated Charities Corporation of Frederick. Provide a grant
to the Board of Directors of The Federated Charities
Corporation of Frederick for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of five infrastructure
projects to an historic property operated as a nonprofit center
(Frederick County) ...................................................................... 150,000
(AV) Heartly House Facilities Expansion. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of Heartly House, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
– 90 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Heartly House facilities (Frederick County) .............................. 50,000
(AW) Harmer’s Town Art Center. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Harmer’s Town Art Center, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Harmer’s Town Art Center property (Harford County)............. 50,000
(AX) Izaak Walton League of American Conservation and Education
Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the Harford
County Chapter Izaak Walton League of America Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Izaak Walton League of America Conservation
and Education Center (Harford County) .................................... 50,000
(AY) Sgt. Alfred B. Hilton Memorial Post No. 55. Provide a grant to
the Board of Trustees of the Sgt. Alfred B. Hilton Memorial
Post No. 55, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Sgt. Alfred B.
Hilton Memorial Post No. 55 property (Harford County) .......... 50,000
(AZ) Community Action Council (CAC) of Howard County Route
One Service Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of the Community Action Council of Howard County Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Community Action Council (CAC) of Howard
County Route One Service Center (Howard County) ................ 250,000
(BA) Ellicott City 50+ Center. Provide a grant to the County
Executive and County Council of Howard County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Ellicott City 50+ Center including entrance
ADA accessibility improvements (Howard County)................... 150,000
(BB) American Legion Post No. 171. Provide a grant to the Executive
Committee of the Damascus American Legion Post No. 171 for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the American Legion Post No. 171 property
(Montgomery County) ................................................................. 85,000
– 91 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(BC) Bannockburn Nursery School and Community Clubhouse.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of Bannockburn
Community Club, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Bannockburn
Nursery School and Community Clubhouse property
(Montgomery County) ................................................................. 100,000
(BD) Calverton Galway Local Park. Provide a grant to the Board of
Commissioners of the Maryland–National Capital Park and
Planning Commission for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Calverton
Galway Local Park including playground renovation with
parking lot and ADA improvements and stormwater
management (Montgomery County) ........................................... 150,000
(BE) CCACC Health Center. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Chinese Culture and Community Service
Center, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the CCACC Health
Center renovation and relocation project (Montgomery
County) ........................................................................................ 125,000
(BF) Children’s Inn at the National Institutes of Health –
Expanding Capacity to Serve Young Patients Participating in
Clinical Trials. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the
Children’s Inn at NIH, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of two
Water Fountains/Bottle Dispensers and three Public
Restrooms in a new 15,000–square–foot wing to support NIH
pediatric research (Montgomery County)................................... 50,000
(BG) Dalewood Drive Playground. Provide a grant to the Board of
Commissioners of the Maryland–National Capital Park and
Planning Commission for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Dalewood Drive
Playground including construction costs of a new playground,
picnic area, play fields, and accessible pathways (Montgomery
County) ........................................................................................ 150,000
(BH) Greens Sustainability Initiative. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of The Greens at Leisure World for the acquisition,
– 92 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of The
Greens for sustainability upgrades/replacements including the
garage ceiling tiles (Montgomery County) ................................. 50,000
(BI) Imagination Stage. Provide a grant to the Board of Trustees of
Imagination Stage, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Imagination
Stage facilities, including safety and accessibility
improvements (Montgomery County) ......................................... 50,000
(BJ) Ivymount School. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
The Ivymount School, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of The Ivymount
School aging school upgrades project (Montgomery County) .... 80,000
(BK) Katherine Thomas School Playground. Provide a grant to the
Board of Trustees of TLC – The Treatment and Learning
Centers, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Katherine
Thomas School Playground (Montgomery County) ................... 20,000
(BL) Kenmont ADA Compliant Walkway Improvements. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of the Kensington Heights
Recreation Association, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
ADA upgrades and walkway improvements, enhancing paths
to the Kenmont clubhouse (Montgomery County) ..................... 81,000
(BM) Metropolitan Washington Ear Critical Control Room and
Studio. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of The
Metropolitan Washington Ear, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Metropolitan Washington Ear critical control room and studio
(Montgomery County) ................................................................. 36,000
(BN) Montgomery County History Center. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of The Montgomery County Historical
Society, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of a Montgomery County
– 93 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
History Center (Montgomery County) ........................................ 20,000
(BO) National Center for Children and Families – Re–Engineering
A Safe Space. Provide a grant to the Board of Trustees of The
National Center for Children and Families, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of a guard station with 24–hour monitoring to
protect the residents, the staff and the surrounding
neighborhood from uninvited persons (youth and adults) access
and unwanted private property intrusion (Montgomery
County) ........................................................................................ 50,000
(BP) New Hampshire Estates Neighborhood Parks. Provide a grant
to the Board of Commissioners of the Maryland–National
Capital Park and Planning Commission for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
New Hampshire Estates Neighborhood park project properties
including a lighted soccer field (Montgomery County) .............. 228,000
(BQ) Silver Spring United Methodist Church – Shepherd’s Table
Kitchen Rehabilitation. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Silver Spring United Methodist Church for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Silver Spring United Methodist Church –
Shepherd’s Table Kitchen Rehabilitation project (Montgomery
County) ........................................................................................ 125,000
(BR) Spirit Fit and Health Inclusive Fitness Expansion. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of Spirit Fit and Health, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of SPIRIT Club’s current inclusive gym space
(Montgomery County) ................................................................. 75,000
(BS) Talbott Street Park. Provide a grant to the Mayor and Council
of Rockville for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Talbott Street Park,
including demolishing a decommissioned Water Tower and
designing and constructing a new 0.5–acre park on the
city–owned parcel (Montgomery County) ................................... 200,000
(BT) Teen Girl Center Renewal. Provide a grant to the Board of
– 94 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
Directors of Crittenton Services of Greater Washington for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Teen Girl Center (Montgomery County) ......... 100,000
(BU) Wheaton Volunteer Rescue Squad – Rescue Squad Truck.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the Wheaton
Volunteer Rescue Squad, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
rescue squad truck (Montgomery County) ................................. 75,000
(BV) 60+ARTS – Active Retired Talented Seniors. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of the Coalition for African Americans
in the Performing Arts, Incorporated for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
CAAPA’s 60+ARTS (Active Retired Talented Seniors) Project:
Enhancing Lives of the Aging facilities (Prince George’s
County) ........................................................................................ 50,000
(BW) AI PerVista Security System at Bowie State University.
Provide a grant to the Board of Visitors of Bowie State
University for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Bowie State
University including the AI enabled security system PerVista
AI (Prince George’s County) ........................................................ 100,000
(BX) American Legion Post No. 60. Provide a grant to the Post
Officers and the Executive Committee of the Laurel Maryland
Post No. 60, The American Legion Incorporated for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the American Legion Post No. 60 including ADA
access, grading and drainage modifications (Prince George’s
County) ........................................................................................ 150,000
(BY) American Legion Post No. 248. Provide a grant to the Officers
of American Legion Post No. 248, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
American Legion Post No. 248 property (Prince George’s
County) ........................................................................................ 75,000
(BZ) Beale Circle Stormwater Management. Provide a grant to the
– 95 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Mayor and Town Council of the Town of Riverdale Park for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Beale Circle Stormwater Management Project,
including necessary site improvements and the procurement of
essential capital equipment to enhance the project’s
effectiveness and sustainability (Prince George’s County) ........ 100,000
(CA) Berwyn Heights Elementary School. Provide a grant to the
Mayor and Council of the Town of Berwyn Heights for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Berwyn Heights Elementary School including
repair and replacement of the existing school playground, and
resurfacing and repair to the existing tennis and basketball
courts (Prince George’s County) ................................................. 165,000
(CB) Bowie High School. Provide a grant to the Prince George’s
County Public Schools for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of Bowie High School
for renovations and investments including upgrading the
security camera system to ensure a safer environment for
students and staff (Prince George’s County) .............................. 100,000
(CC) Edmonston Park Development. Provide a grant to the Mayor
and Town Council of Edmonston for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Edmonston Park Development project including a trail,
picnicking, an amphitheater pavilion, and landscaping (Prince
George’s County) ......................................................................... 100,000
(CD) EXCEL Academy Public Charter School. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of Sowing Empowerment & Economic
Development, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the EXCEL
Academy Public Charter School, including the gymnasium
project completion (Prince George’s County) ............................. 100,000
(CE) Greenbelt Community Center. Provide a grant to the Mayor
and City Council of the City of Greenbelt, Maryland for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Greenbelt Community Center including the
– 96 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
modernization and replacement of the elevators (Prince
George’s County) ......................................................................... 200,000
(CF) Hard Bargain Farm Environmental Center. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of the Alice Ferguson Foundation, Inc.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Hard Bargain Farm (HBF)
Environmental Center Campus (Prince George’s County) ........ 200,000
(CG) Inncuvate Innovation Studio. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Inncuvate Community Development Partners for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Inncuvate Innovation Studio in Largo
(Prince George’s County) ............................................................. 50,000
(CH) Intergenerational Day Center. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Restoration Community Empowerment Center
(RCEC) for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of an Intergenerational
Day Center (Prince George’s County) ......................................... 75,000
(CI) Latin American Youth Center Prince George’s County. Provide
a grant to the Board of Directors of the Latin American Youth
Center for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Latin American
Youth Center Prince George’s County site restoration project
(Prince George’s County) ............................................................. 100,000
(CJ) Oxon Hill Recreation Club. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Oxon Hill Recreation Club Inc for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Oxon Hill Recreation Club property (Prince
George’s County) ......................................................................... 50,000
(CK) Samuel Ogle Middle School – Digital Signage. Provide a grant
to the Board of Education of Prince George’s County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Samuel Ogle Middle School property,
including Digital Signage (Prince George’s County).................. 21,000
– 97 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(CL) Sheppard Pratt – Residential Program Homes. Provide a grant
to the Board of Trustees of Sheppard Pratt for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Residential Program Homes renovation project (Prince
George’s County) ......................................................................... 50,000
(CM) Town of University Park Town Hall. Provide a grant to the
Mayor and Common Council of University Park for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Town of University Park Town Hall
construction (Prince George’s County) ....................................... 50,000
(CN) Workforce Development and Violence Intervention Program.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of Creating
Opportunities Within Our Community (COWOC) for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Workforce Development and Violence
Intervention Program (Prince George’s County) ....................... 100,000
(CO) Town of Barclay Community Center and Town Hall. Provide a
grant to the Board of Commissioners of Barclay, Maryland for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Town of Barclay Community Center
and Town Hall to enhance access to resources for residents,
create a destination for visitors, and create a sense of place for
the Town (Queen Anne’s County) ............................................... 125,000
(CP) Boys and Girls Club of Washington County. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of The Boys & Girls Club of Washington
County, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Boys and Girls Club
of Washington County project (Washington County) ................ 200,000
(CQ) Western Enterprise Fire Company No. 4. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the Western Enterprises Fire Company
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Western Enterprise Fire Company No.
4 property (Washington County) ................................................ 230,000
(CR) Parsonsburg Fire Company Community Center. Provide a
– 98 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
grant to the Board of Directors of the Parsonsburg Fire
Company, Incorporated for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Parsonsburg
Fire Company Community Center including ADA, security and
safety improvements (Wicomico County) ................................... 150,000
ZA03 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(Statewide)
(A) Legislative Initiatives. Provide funds for projects of political
subdivisions and nonprofit organizations .................................. 25,000,000
(A) Goodwill Fire Company No. 1 Tanker Replacement. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of the Goodwill Volunteer Fire
Company No. 1 for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of a new tanker to replace
the current 1990 Ford L9000 Engine Tanker (Allegany
County) ......................................................................................... 100,000
(B) Orleans Volunteer Fire Company Building. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of the Orleans Volunteer Fire Company,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Orleans Volunteer Fire Company
Building (Allegany County) ........................................................ 50,000
(C) Annapolis Juneteenth Museum and Cafe. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the Celebrate Annapolis Juneteenth
Corporation for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of a permanent museum and soul food
cafe in the heart of Annapolis’ historic district (Anne Arundel
County) ......................................................................................... 200,000
(D) Chesapeake High School Field House. Provide a grant to the
Board of Education of Anne Arundel County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Chesapeake High School Field House (Anne Arundel County) .. 100,000
(E) Crofton Spay–Neuter Clinic. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Rude Ranch Animal Rescue for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
– 99 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Crofton Spay–Neuter Clinic (Anne Arundel County) ................. 29,000
(F) Earleigh Heights Volunteer Fire Company Station. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of The Earleigh Heights
Volunteer Fire Company of Anne Arundel for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
new fire station (Anne Arundel County) ..................................... 50,000
(G) Gaudenzia Crownsville Campus. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of Gaudenzia Foundation, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Gaudenzia Crownsville Campus property (Anne Arundel
County) ......................................................................................... 50,000
(H) Glen Burnie Center Medicine and Behavioral Health Build Out.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of Chase Brexton
Health Services, Inc. for delivery of care to low–income
populations (Anne Arundel County) ........................................... 250,000
(I) Herald Harbor Community Center. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of The Herald Harbor Citizens Association
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Herald Harbor Community Center
including roof repair and replacement (Anne Arundel
County) ......................................................................................... 8,000
(J) Kiwanis Club of Commodore Mayo. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the Kiwanis Club of Commodore Mayo,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Kiwanis Club of Commodore Mayo
including roof and bathroom replacement (Anne Arundel
County) ......................................................................................... 50,000
(K) Severna Park BPOE 2482. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Severna Park BPOE 2482 Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Severna Park BPOE 2482 building to include
ADA Bathroom renovation and wheelchair access (Anne
Arundel County) .......................................................................... 120,000
(L) Stoney Beach Living Shoreline. Provide a grant to the Council
– 100 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
of Unit Owners of Stoney Beach Condominium Association for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of a living shoreline restoration project (Anne
Arundel County) .......................................................................... 120,000
(M) Chesapeake Bay Outward Bound School. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the Chesapeake Bay Outward Bound
School, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Chesapeake Bay Outward Bound
School for facility enhancement and safety upgrade project
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 75,000
(N) Free Housing Project. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of Hachnosas Orchim–Baltimore for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Free Housing Project property (Baltimore City) ......................... 50,000
(O) Garrett–Jacobs Mansion. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of The Garrett–Jacobs Mansion Endowment Fund,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Garrett–Jacobs Mansion including
roof and skylights replacement and floor repairs (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 40,000
(P) HER Resiliency Center’s HER Space. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of HER Resiliency Center for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of HER
Resiliency Center’s HER Space (Baltimore City) ........................ 50,000
(Q) Herring Run Branch Library. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Enoch Pratt Free Library for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Herring Run Branch Library including foundation work
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 100,000
(R) LIFE Outreach Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of LIFE Church Ministries for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the LIFE Outreach
Center, specifically Phase 4, 5, and 6 (Baltimore City) .............. 50,000
– 101 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(S) Loyola School. Provide a grant to the Board of Trustees of The
Loyola School, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of The Loyola School
including added security, handicap access, and community art
gallery space (Baltimore City) ..................................................... 20,000
(T) Maryland State Boychoir Center for the Arts. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of The Maryland State Boychoir, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Maryland State Boychoir Center for the
Arts project Arts including accessibility improvements
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 25,000
(U) P.E.A.C.E. Team Initiative. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of The P.E.A.C.E. Team, LLC for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
P.E.A.C.E. Team facilities (Baltimore City) ............................... 250,000
(V) Ruderman Library and Playground. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the Rebbeztein Ruderman Memorial
Library for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Ruderman Library & Playground
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 120,000
(W) Southern Bridge Career and Education Center. Provide a grant
to the Board of Directors of The Mary Harvin Transformation
Center Community Development Corporation, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of a 25,000 sq ft warehouse across from the Southern
Views Workforce housing, for Early Childhood/Headstart space
and workforce training space (Baltimore City) .......................... 100,000
(X) Thomas Johnson Elementary–Middle School. Provide a grant
to the Board of Directors of KABOOM! for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Thomas Johnson Elementary/Middle School with playground
renovation including a new, inclusive, and engaging play space
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 50,000
– 102 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
(Y) Arbutus Marketplace. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of Southwest Visions Foundation LLC for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Arbutus Marketplace (the former East Drive Shopping Center)
to establish East Drive as a “Main Street” for Arbutus residents
and the University of Maryland Baltimore Campus community
(Baltimore County) ...................................................................... 50,000
(Z) Baltimore Community Food Center. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of AfriThrive Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Baltimore Community Food Center, Essex property project
(Baltimore County) ...................................................................... 50,000
(AA) Baltimore County Volunteer Firefighter’s Association Dry
Hydrant. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the
Baltimore County Volunteer Firefighter’s Association, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Dry Hydrants throughout Baltimore
County (Baltimore County) ......................................................... 150,000
(AB) Calico Cat Cafe. Provide a grant to the Advisory Board of the
Friends of Larchmont, Incorporated for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
transformation of a vacant property into a community cafe and
gathering space (Baltimore County) ........................................... 50,000
(AC) Chesapeake High School Turf Field. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the Chesapeake High School Sports
Boosters Club, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of a turf field for
Chesapeake High School (Baltimore County) ............................. 150,000
(AD) Edmondson Heights Elementary School Playground. Provide a
grant to the Board of Education of Baltimore County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Edmondson Heights Elementary School
facilities and playground (Baltimore County) ............................ 100,000
(AE) Franklin Point at Deerborne Dog Park. Provide a grant to the
– 103 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Board of Directors of the Franklin Point at Deerborne
Homeowners Association, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
dog park, including all labor and materials for tree and brush
removal, clearing, pipe bedding installation, fencing, dog waste
stations, and debris removal (Baltimore County)....................... 40,000
(AF) Fullerton Elementary School Electronic Sign. Provide a grant
to the Board of Education of Baltimore County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of an electronic school sign and other facility
improvements at Fullerton Elementary School (Baltimore
County) ......................................................................................... 80,000
(AG) GLA Performing Arts Center. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of GLA Youth Church Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
GLA Performing Arts Center, including all labor and materials,
as well as plumbing and electrical requirements (Baltimore
County) ......................................................................................... 50,000
(AH) Honeygo Regional Veterans Memorial. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of Honeygo Regional Veterans Memorial
Incorporated for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Honeygo Regional Veterans
Memorial project (Baltimore County) ......................................... 32,000
(AI) Idlewylde Community Hall. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of The Idlewylde Improvement Association, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Idlewylde Community Hall (Baltimore
County) ......................................................................................... 180,000
(AJ) Jacksonville Elementary School Playground. Provide a grant to
the Board of Education of Baltimore County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Jacksonville Elementary School Playground (Baltimore
County) ......................................................................................... 100,000
(AK) Maryland State Fair. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
– 104 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
of The Maryland State Fair & Agricultural Society, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Maryland State Fair for Maryland State Fair
buildings and facilities (Baltimore County) ............................... 100,000
(AL) Maryland Troopers Association Headquarters. Provide a grant
to the Board of Directors of the Maryland Troopers Association,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Maryland Troopers Association
Headquarters property, including foundation and basement
repairs and renovation (Baltimore County) ................................ 100,000
(AM) Mays Chapel Elementary School. Provide a grant to the Board
of Education of Baltimore County for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Mays Chapel Elementary School facilities including the
playground (Baltimore County) .................................................. 90,000
(AN) Mt. Pleasant AMEC Grave Restoration. Provide a grant to the
Board of Trustees of Mt. Pleasant African Methodist Episcopal
Church, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Mt. Pleasant AMEC Gravesite
(Baltimore County) ...................................................................... 34,000
(AO) Parkville Middle School. Provide a grant to the Board of
Education of Baltimore County for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
gym partition and other facility improvements at Parkville
Middle School (Baltimore County) .............................................. 35,000
(AP) Tsunami Martial Arts Academy. Provide a grant to the Officers
of the Tsunami Martial Arts Academy for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Tsunami Martial Arts Academy restoration project (Baltimore
County) ......................................................................................... 250,000
(AQ) Annmarie Sculpture Garden & Arts Center. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of Ann’s Circle, Inc. DBA Annmarie
Sculpture Garden & Arts Center for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
– 105 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Annmarie Garden Maintenance Facility Modernization Project,
including relocating site maintenance functions to address
safety concerns, ADA guidelines, efficiency, and functionality
(Calvert County) .......................................................................... 100,000
(AR) Bayside History Museum. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of the Bayside History Museum, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Bayside History Museum property including
roof replacement (Calvert County) .............................................. 70,000
(AS) Anna Murray Douglass Museum and Visitor Center. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of the Bailey–Groce Family
Foundation Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Anna Murray
Douglass Museum and Visitor Center (Caroline County) .......... 50,000
(AT) Benedictine School for Exceptional Children – Student
Residential Facility. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of The Benedictine School for Exceptional Children, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Benedictine School for Exceptional Children
property including the Student Residential Facility (Caroline
County) ......................................................................................... 50,000
(AU) Mount Airy Flat Iron Building. Provide a grant to the Mayor
and Council of Mount Airy for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Mount Airy Flat Iron
Building (Carroll County) ........................................................... 150,000
125,000
(AU–1) Eldersburg Elementary School Inclusive Play Space. Provide a
grant to the Carroll County Board of Education for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Eldersburg Elementary School Inclusive Play
Space (Carroll County) ................................................................ 25,000
(AV) Union Bridge Fire Company. Provide a grant to the Officers of
the Union Bridge Fire Company for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
– 106 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Union Bridge Fire Company facilities (Carroll County) ............ 70,000
(AW) Plumpton Park Zoo Tiger–Lion Habitat. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the Plumpton Park Zoological Gardens,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Plumpton Park Zoo to include the
expansion of the Tiger and Lion exhibit area (Cecil County) ..... 100,000
(AX) Boys and Girls Club of Southern Maryland – Waldorf Club
Park. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of The Boys and
Girls Clubs of Southern Maryland, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Boys and Girls Club of Southern Maryland – Waldorf Club
Park (Charles County) ................................................................. 210,000
(AY) F.O.P. Cambridge–Dorchester Lodge No. 27. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of the Fraternal Order of Police,
Cambridge–Dorchester Lodge No. 27, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
F.O.P. Cambridge–Dorchester Lodge No. 27, Inc. building
(Dorchester County) ..................................................................... 50,000
(AZ) Frederick Youth Center. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of The Ausherman Family Foundation for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Frederick Youth Center (Frederick County) .... 150,000
(BA) Great Frederick Fair. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of The Great Frederick Fair, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of The
Great Frederick Fair facilities, including stage roof upgrade
(Frederick County) ....................................................................... 130,000
(BB) New Midway Volunteer Fire Company. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the New Midway Volunteer Fire Company
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the New Midway Volunteer Fire Company
building renovation project (Frederick County) ......................... 25,000
– 107 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(BC) Seventh Street Fountain Park. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Downtown Frederick Partnership, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Seventh Street Fountain Park and facilities
including a freestanding sculpture and artistic paving
(Frederick County) ....................................................................... 50,000
(BD) Splash Point at Baker Park. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of The Community Foundation of Frederick County,
Maryland, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Splash Point
interactive splash pad at Baker Park (Frederick County) .......... 25,000
(BE) Wolfsville Ruritan Playground. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Wolfsville Ruritan Club, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Wolfsville Ruritan Playground (Frederick County) ................... 80,000
(BF) Oakland Volunteer Fire Department. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the Oakland Volunteer Fire Department,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Oakland Volunteer Fire
Department property (Garrett County) ....................................... 100,000
(BG) Havre de Grace STAR (Sports Theatre Arts Recreation) Centre.
Provide a grant to the Mayor and City Council of Havre de
Grace for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Havre de Grace STAR (Sports
Theatre Arts Recreation) Centre (Harford County) .................... 100,000
(BH) Maryland Center for the Visual and Performing Arts. Provide a
grant to the Board of Trustees of the Maryland Center for the
Arts for Visual and Performing Arts for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Maryland Center for the Visual and Performing Arts, including
a community amphitheater (Harford County) ............................ 100,000
(BI) Maryland Polo Club. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of P.S.M., Inc./Maryland Polo Club for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
– 108 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Maryland Polo Club property including construction and site
work for a maintenance facility (Harford County) ..................... 25,000
(BJ) Schucks Road Regional Park. Provide a grant to the County
Executive and County Council of Harford County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Schucks Road Regional Park including restroom
facilities to support Miracle League baseball (Harford
County) ......................................................................................... 100,000
(BK) Athelton Atholton Adventist Academy Outdoor Education
Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the
Chesapeake Conference Association of Seventh–day Adventists
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Athelton Atholton Adventist Academy
Outdoor Education Center (Howard County) ............................. 150,000
(BL) Howard County Chinese School Expansion for Cultural and
Educational Enrichment. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Howard County Chinese School Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Howard County Chinese School (HCCS)
property (Howard County) .......................................................... 75,000
(BM) Preservation Maryland Headquarters in Howard County.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of The Society for the
Preservation of Maryland Antiquities, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
historic Ellicott City Jail (Howard County) ............................... 200,000
(BN) Radcliffe Creek School. Provide a grant to the Board of Trustees
of the Radcliffe Creek School, Incorporated for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Radcliffe Creek School property including the roof and climate
control system (Kent County)....................................................... 100,000
(BO) Bannockburn Nursery School and Community Clubhouse.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of Bannockburn
Community Club, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
– 109 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
improvement, and capital equipping of the Bannockburn
Nursery School and Community Clubhouse property
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. 200,000
(BP) Centerway Local Park. Provide a grant to the Board of
Commissioners of the Maryland–National Capital Park and
Planning Commission for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of updated and/or new
park amenities, such as a skate park, and improve accessibility
to the Centerway Local Park property (Montgomery County) .... 150,000
(BQ) Dalewood Drive Playground. Provide a grant to the Board of
Commissioners of the Maryland–National Capital Park and
Planning Commission for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Dalewood Drive
Playground including construction costs of a new playground,
picnic area, play fields, and accessible pathways (Montgomery
County) ......................................................................................... 250,000
(BR) Elwood Smith Community Center. Provide a grant to the Mayor
and Council of Rockville for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Elwood Smith
Community Center (Montgomery County) .................................. 110,000
(BS) Friends House ArtSpaces. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Friends House Retirement Community, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of a new art studio, woodshop, textile studio,
model train room and ceramics studio (Montgomery
County) ......................................................................................... 50,000
(BT) Gaithersburg Municipal Complex. Provide a grant to the Mayor
and the City Council for the City of Gaithersburg for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of a new municipal complex and city facilities
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. 100,000
(BU) Georgia Avenue Noise Mitigation Fencing Project. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of the Leisure World of Maryland
Corporation for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
– 110 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
and capital equipping of the Georgia Avenue Noise Mitigation
Fencing Project (Montgomery County) ........................................ 150,000
(BV) Greens Sustainability Initiative. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of The Greens at Leisure World for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of The
Greens for sustainability upgrades/replacements including the
garage ceiling tiles (Montgomery County) .................................. 50,000
(BW) Katherine Thomas School Playground. Provide a grant to the
Board of Trustees of TLC – The Treatment and Learning
Centers, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Katherine Thomas School
Playground (Montgomery County) .............................................. 145,000
(BX) Madison Fields. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
Madison House Autism Foundation, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Madison Fields buildings and grounds (Montgomery County) . 62,000
(BY) Montgomery Village Bocce Court. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of the Montgomery Village Foundation for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Montgomery Village Bocce Court facilities
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. 50,000
(BZ) OASIS – Farming Diversification and Capacity Improvement.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the Organization for
Advancement of and Service for Individuals with Special Needs
(OASIS), Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of farming diversification
and capacity improvement to serve more special needs
participants (Montgomery County) ............................................. 100,000
(CA) Public Works Facility Renovations – Phase II Design. Provide a
grant to the Mayor and Council of the City of Takoma Park for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Public Works Facility Renovations –
Phase II Design, including energy efficiency upgrades (HVAC,
solar panels), workspace expansion, and increased restroom
– 111 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
facilities (Montgomery County) ................................................... 120,000
(CB) Quality Time Learning Center. Provide a grant to the Officers
of Quality Time Learning Center, LLC for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Quality Time Learning Center facility (Montgomery County) ... 100,000
(CC) Sugarland Ethno History Project – and the Dorsey Site. Provide
a grant to the Board of Directors of The Sugarland Ethno
History Project for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Sugarland Ethno
History Project property and the Dorsey Site (Montgomery
County) ......................................................................................... 80,000
(CD) AI PerVista Security System at Bowie State University. Provide
a grant to the Board of Visitors of Bowie State University for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Bowie State University including the AI
enabled security system PerVista AI (Prince George’s County) .. 100,000
(CE) American Legion Post No. 131. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of Colmar Manor Post No. 131, The American Legion,
Incorporated for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the American Legion Post No. 131
building (Prince George’s County) .............................................. 158,000
(CF) Ardmore Park Playground. Provide a grant to the Board of
Commissioners of the Maryland–National Capital Park and
Planning Commission for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Ardmore Park
Playground (Prince George’s County) ......................................... 155,000
(CG) Bowie Center for the Performing Arts. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the Bowie Regional Arts Vision
Association, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Bowie Center for the
Performing Arts for Performing Arts property including the
marquee (Prince George’s County) .............................................. 20,000
(CH) Comprehensive Community Health, Wellness, Art, Resource,
– 112 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
Technology, Enrichment and Learning Center. Provide a grant
to the Board of Directors of Food 4 Thought Group, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Food 4 Thought Group’s Comprehensive
Community Health, Wellness, Art, Resource, Technology,
Enrichment & Learning Center (Prince George’s County) ......... 125,000
(CI) Girl Scout Camp Aquasco. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Girl Scout Council of the Nation’s Capital for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Camp Aquasco property (Prince
George’s County) .......................................................................... 25,000
(CJ) Inncuvate Innovation Studio. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Inncuvate Community Development Partners for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Inncuvate Innovation Studio in Largo
(Prince George’s County) ............................................................. 25,000
(CK) Largo High School Football Field. Provide a grant to the Prince
George’s County Board of Education for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Largo High School Football Field including leveling, regrading
and re–sodding (Prince George’s County) ................................... 100,000
(CL) Laurel Boys and Girls Club. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Laurel Boys and Girls Club, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Laurel Boys and Girls Club property (Prince George’s County) 100,000
(CM) Low Power FM Radio Education Initiative. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of Strategic Music Partnerships Inc for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Low Power FM Radio Education
Initiative property (Prince George’s County) ............................... 100,000
(CN) MEOR Cultural Center. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of The Maryland Jewish Experience, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
– 113 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
equipping of the MEOR (The Maryland Jewish Experience, Inc.)
property (Prince George’s County) ............................................... 150,000
(CO) Monument on the Potomac. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the GYPASO Corporation for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Monument on the Potomac initiative including a museum that
will exhibit and illustrate the remarkable history of pioneers
from Prince George’s County (Prince George’s County) .............. 150,000
(CP) Prince George’s County Youth Empowerment Project. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of The Blake Bozeman
Foundation Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Prince George’s
County Youth Empowerment Project facilities (Prince George’s
County) ......................................................................................... 10,000
(CQ) Suitland Civic Association Community Center. Provide a grant
to the Executive Board of the Suitland Civic Association, Inc.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of a new Suitland Civic Association
Community Center (Prince George’s County) ............................. 105,000
(CR) Town of Eagle Harbor Town Hall. Provide a grant to the Board
of Commissioners of the Town of Eagle Harbor for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Town of Eagle Harbor Town Hall including
roof, HVAC, and numerous other facility repairs (Prince
George’s County) .......................................................................... 150,000
(CS) Town of University Park Town Hall. Provide a grant to the
Mayor and Common Council of University Park for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Town of University Park Town Hall
construction (Prince George’s County) ........................................ 50,000
(CT) Queen Anne’s County Arts Council Annex. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of The Queen Anne’s County Arts
Council, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Annex building (Queen Anne’s
– 114 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
County) ......................................................................................... 100,000
(CU) Walter Polk American Legion. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Walter Polk American Legion Post 132, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Walter Polk American Legion property
(Somerset County) ........................................................................ 100,000
(CV) Second District Volunteer Fire Department and Rescue Squad
Solar Panels. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the
Second District Volunteer Fire Department and Rescue Squad,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Second District Volunteer Fire
Department and Rescue Squad Solar Panels project (St. Mary’s
County) ......................................................................................... 100,000
(CW) St. Mary’s County Elks Lodge No. 2092. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the St. Mary’s County, Maryland Lodge
No. 2092, Benevolent and Protective Order of Elks of the United
States of America, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Elks Lodge property
including building HVAC and large refrigeration system (St.
Mary’s County) ............................................................................. 25,000
(CX) Critchlow Adkins Children’s Center’s Cordova Site Expansion.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of Easton Day Care
Center, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Critchlow Adkins Children’s
Center’s Cordova Site Expansion project (Talbot County) ......... 50,000
(CY) Federal Little League. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of Federal Little League of Hagerstown, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Federal Little League facilities (Washington County) ................ 125,000
75,000
(CY–1) Valley Little League. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of Valley Little League, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Valley Little League facilities (Washington County) .................. 75,000
– 115 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
50,000
(CZ) Western Enterprise Fire Company No. 4. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the Western Enterprise Fire Company for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Western Enterprise Fire Company No.
4 property (Washington County) ................................................. 87,000
(DA) Mason Dixon Complex – Phase II. Provide a grant to the County
Executive and County Council of Wicomico County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Phase II of the Mason Dixon Complex project
which will include construction of the parking lot and site
amenities (Wicomico County) ...................................................... 100,000
(DB) Wicomico County Humane Society Shelter Construction.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the Humane Society
of Wicomico County, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Wicomico County
Humane Society Shelter Construction for the Wicomico County
Humane Society (Wicomico County) ........................................... 20,000
(DC) Wicomico Nursing Home. Provide a grant to the County
Executive and County Council of Wicomico County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Wicomico Nursing Home including roof
replacement (Wicomico County) .................................................. 75,000
(DD) Worcester County Humane Society. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of the Worcester County Humane Society,
Incorporated for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of a new Worcester County Humane
Society facility (Worcester County) .............................................. 20,000
(4) An annual tax is imposed on all assessable property in the State in rate and
amount sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds, as and when due and
until paid in full. The principal shall be discharged within 15 years after the date of issue
of the bonds.
(5) (a) Prior to the payment of any matching grant funds under the provisions
of Section 1(3) Items ZA00 through ZB02 of this Act, grantees shall provide and expend
– 116 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
matching funds as specified. No part of a grantee’s matching fund may be provided, either
directly or indirectly, from funds of the State, whether appropriated or unappropriated.
Except as otherwise provided, no part of the fund may consist of real property, in kind
contributions, or funds expended prior to the effective date of this Act. In case of any dispute
as to what money or assets may qualify as matching funds, the Board of Public Works shall
determine the matter, and the Board’s decision is final. Grantees have until June 1, 2027,
to present evidence satisfactory to the Board of Public Works that the matching fund will
be provided. If satisfactory evidence is presented, the Board shall certify this fact to the
State Treasurer and the proceeds of the loan shall be expended for the purposes provided in
this Act. If this evidence is not presented by June 1, 2027, the proceeds of the loan shall be
applied to the purposes authorized in § 8–129 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(b) It is further provided that when an equal and matching fund is specified
in Section 1(3) Items ZA00 through ZB02 of this Act, grantees shall provide a matching fund
equal to the lesser of (i) the authorized amount of the State grant or (ii) the amount of the
matching fund certified by the Board of Public Works. If satisfactory evidence is presented,
the Board shall certify this fact and the amount of the matching fund to the State Treasurer
and the proceeds of the loan equal to the amount of the matching fund shall be expended for
the purposes provided in this Act. If this evidence is not presented by June 1, 2027, the
proceeds of the loan shall be applied to the purposes authorized in § 8–129 of the State
Finance and Procurement Article. The proceeds of any amount of the loan in excess of the
matching fund certified by the Board of Public Works shall also be applied to the purposes
authorized in § 8–129 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(6) (a) Prior to approval by the Board of Public Works of an expenditure of bond
proceeds authorized under Section 1(3) Items ZA00 through ZB02 of this Act, the grantee
shall grant and convey to the Maryland Historical Trust a historic preservation easement
on the property where the capital project assisted by the bond proceeds is located if the
Director of the Trust determines that the capital project impacts real property that is
individually listed in, or eligible for individual listing in, the Maryland Register of Historic
Properties, unless the Director of the Trust also determines that the real property:
(i) Is a type that is already adequately represented among the
Trust’s existing easement properties;
(ii) Is already subject to adequate protections of historic preservation
law or instrument; or
(iii) Has conditions peculiar to it that make requiring an easement
impractical.
(b) If the grantee holds a lease on the property, the Trust may accept an
easement on the leasehold interest.
(c) The easement must be in form, substance, and duration acceptable to
the Director of the Trust.
– 117 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(d) (i) A recipient may administratively appeal to the Maryland
Historical Trust Board of Trustees a determination made by the Director of the Trust under
subparagraph (a) of this paragraph.
(ii) The decision made by the Maryland Historical Trust Board of
Trustees on an appeal is final and is not subject to further administrative appeal or judicial
review.
(7) The proceeds of the loan must be expended or encumbered by the Board of
Public Works for the purposes provided in this Act no later than June 1, 2032. If any funds
authorized by this Act remain unexpended or unencumbered after June 1, 2032, the amount
of the unexpended or unencumbered authorization shall be canceled and be of no further
force and effect. If bonds have been issued for the loan, the amount of unexpended or
unencumbered bond proceeds shall be disposed of as provided in § 8–129 of the State
Finance and Procurement Article.
(8) Multiple grants provided to the same organization in this Section are in
addition to one another. Unless otherwise provided, any matching fund requirements apply
to each individual grant.
(9) (a) Subject to subparagraphs (b) through (d) of this paragraph, the Board of
Public Works may approve an appropriation in Section 1(3) Items ZA00 through ZB02 of
this Act or in any other previously enacted Maryland Consolidated Capital Bond Loan Act,
notwithstanding differences in:
(i) The name of the grantee or the description of the project, provided
that the proposed use of funds is consistent with the public purpose of the original
appropriation; or
(ii) The location of the project.
(b) When the difference in the name of the grantee is nonsubstantive and
the identity of the grantee can be determined, and when the difference in the description of
the project is nonsubstantive and is consistent with the public purpose of the original
appropriation, the Department of General Services shall record the correct grantee
identification and project description in the grant agreement entered into by the grantee
with the State of Maryland and recorded with the Board of Public Works. In all other
instances of differences provided in subparagraph (a) of this paragraph, the Department of
Budget and Management shall notify the Office of Policy Analysis within the Department
of Legislative Services in writing of:
(i) The differences between an appropriation in Section 1(3) Items
ZA00 through ZB02 of this Act and the proposed use of the funds; and
(ii) The justification that the proposed use of the funds is consistent
– 118 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
with the public purpose of the appropriation.
(c) (i) The Office of Policy Analysis shall have 45 days to review and
comment on the proposed use of the funds.
(ii) If the Office of Policy Analysis does not submit written objections
within 45 days, the Department of Budget and Management shall provide certification in
writing to the Board of Public Works that the proposed use of funds may be approved
notwithstanding differences in the appropriation in Section 1(3) Items ZA00 through ZB02
of this Act.
(d) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the provisions of this
paragraph:
(i) Provide an administrative process authorizing the approval of
grants by the Board of Public Works, provided that the proposed use of funds is consistent
with the public purpose of the original appropriation; and
(ii) Be applicable to this Act and all prior Maryland Consolidated
Capital Bond Loans.
(10) Notwithstanding § 8–122.1 of the State Finance and Procurement Article, the
principal amount of any loan authorized under this Act shall be reduced by the cash
proceeds, excluding any accrued interest, received for the State bonds and allocated by the
Comptroller to the loan.
(11) Notwithstanding §§ 8–125(e) and 8–132 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article, the State Treasurer shall determine the amount of premium from the sale of bonds
in fiscal years 2024 and 2025 to be transferred to the Annuity Bond Fund. Upon each
issuance of State bonds in fiscal years 2024 and 2025, the Treasurer shall notify the
Comptroller of the Treasurer’s determination and the Comptroller shall credit the premium
accordingly. Premium from the sale of bonds in fiscal years 2024 and 2025 that is not
transferred to the Annuity Bond Fund may, upon approval of the Board of Public Works, be
expended by the Comptroller for any of the public purposes set forth in Section 1(3) of this
Act, including any applicable architects’ and engineers’ fees.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Chapter 396 of the Acts of 2011, as amended by Chapter
344 of the Acts of 2022 and Chapter 102 of the Acts of
2023
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
– 119 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
DW01.10 DIVISION OF HISTORICAL AND CULTURAL PROGRAMS
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland Historical Trust. Provide funds for the African
American Heritage Preservation Program to assist in the
protection of historic property. The funds appropriated for this
purpose shall be administered in accordance with § 5A–330 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article. Notwithstanding
Section 1(7) of this Act, this authorization may not terminate
prior to June 1, [2025] 2027 ....................................................... 1,000,000
Chapter 444 of the Acts of 2012, as amended by Chapter
344 of the Acts of 2022 and Chapter 102 of the Acts of
2023
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
DW01.10 DIVISION OF HISTORICAL AND CULTURAL PROGRAMS
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland Historical Trust. Provide funds for the African
American Heritage Preservation Program to assist in the
protection of historic property. The funds appropriated for this
purpose shall be administered in accordance with § 5A–330 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article. Notwithstanding
Section 1(7) of this Act, this authorization may not terminate
prior to June 1, [2025] 2027 ....................................................... 1,000,000
Chapter 424 of the Acts of 2013
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES
QB06.04 DORSEY RUN CORRECTIONAL FACILITY
(Anne Arundel County)
(A) 560–Bed Minimum Security Compound. Provide funds to
construct a new 560–bed minimum security compound at
Dorsey Run Correctional Facility, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may commence on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to [987,000]
– 120 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
complete this project ................................................................... 881,601
Chapter 424 of the Acts of 2013, as amended by Chapter
463 of the Acts of 2014, Chapter 495 of the Acts of 2015,
Chapter 27 of the Acts of 2016, Chapter 22 of the Acts of
2017, Chapter 9 of the Acts of 2018, Chapter 14 of the
Acts of 2019, Chapter 537 of the Acts of 2020, and
Chapter 63 of the Acts of 2021
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2013 in the total principal amount of [$1,098,036,654]
$1,097,931,255. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 of the State Finance
and Procurement Article and Article 31, § 22 of the Code.
Chapter 424 of the Acts of 2013, as amended by Chapter
344 of the Acts of 2022 and Chapter 102 of the Acts of
2023
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
DW01.10 DIVISION OF HISTORICAL AND CULTURAL PROGRAMS
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland Historical Trust. Provide funds for the African
American Heritage Preservation Program to assist in the
protection of historic property. The funds appropriated for this
purpose shall be administered in accordance with § 5A–330 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article. Notwithstanding
Section 1(7) of this Act, this authorization may not terminate
prior to June 1, [2025] 2027 ....................................................... 1,000,000
Chapter 463 of the Acts of 2014, as amended by Chapter
344 of the Acts of 2022 and Chapter 102 of the Acts of
2023
Section 1(3)
– 121 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
DW01.10 DIVISION OF HISTORICAL AND CULTURAL PROGRAMS
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland Historical Trust. Provide funds for the African
American Heritage Preservation Grant Program to assist in the
protection of historic property. The funds appropriated for this
purpose shall be administered in accordance with § 5A–330 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article. Notwithstanding
Section 1(7) of this Act, this authorization may not terminate
prior to June 1, [2025] 2027 ....................................................... 1,000,000
Chapter 495 of the Acts of 2015, as amended by Chapter
344 of the Acts of 2022 and Chapter 102 of the Acts of
2023
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
DW01.11 DIVISION OF HISTORICAL AND CULTURAL PROGRAMS
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland Historical Trust. Provide funds for the African
American Heritage Preservation Grant Program to assist in the
protection of properties with cultural and historic significance
to the African American community. The funds appropriated
for this purpose shall be administered in accordance with the
standards established under § 5A–330 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article. Notwithstanding Section 1(7) of this Act,
this authorization may not terminate prior to June 1, [2025]
2027 ............................................................................................. 1,000,000
Chapter 495 of the Acts of 2015, as amended by Chapter
102 of the Acts of 2023
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
DW01.08 JEFFERSON PATTERSON PARK AND MUSEUM
(Calvert County)
(A) St. Leonard’s Creek Shoreline Erosion Control. Provide funds
to begin design of shoreline erosion control measures and other
– 122 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
improvements along St. Leonard’s Creek at Jefferson Patterson
Park. Notwithstanding Section 1(7) of this Act, this
authorization may not terminate prior to June 1, [2025]
2027 .............................................................................................. 261,000
Chapter 27 of the Acts of 2016
Section 1(3)
DE02.01 BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
JUDICIARY/MULTISERVICE CENTERS
(D) New Catonsville District Court. Provide funds to complete
design and begin construction of a new district
court/multiservice center building in Catonsville and on–site
parking garage, provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of
this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this project.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2027 (Baltimore County) ......................................................... 28,501,000
Chapter 27 of the Acts of 2016, as amended by Chapter
537 of the Acts of 2020 and Chapter 102 of the Acts of
2023
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
DW01.08 JEFFERSON PATTERSON PARK AND MUSEUM
(Calvert County)
(B) St. Leonard’s Creek Shoreline Erosion Control. Provide funds
to design and construct shoreline erosion control measures
and other improvements along St. Leonard’s Creek at
Jefferson Patterson Park and Museum. Notwithstanding
Section 1(7) of this Act, this authorization may not terminate
prior to June 1, [2025] 2027 .................................................... 2,091,172
Chapter 27 of the Acts of 2016, as amended by Chapter
102 of the Acts of 2023
Section 1(3)
– 123 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
DW01.11 DIVISION OF HISTORICAL AND CULTURAL PROGRAMS
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland Historical Trust. Provide funds for the African
American Heritage Preservation Grant Program to assist in the
protection of properties with cultural and historic significance
to the African American community. The funds appropriated
for this purpose shall be administered in accordance with §
5A–330 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
Notwithstanding Section 1(7) of this Act, this authorization
may not terminate prior to June 1, [2025] 2027 ....................... 1,000,000
Chapter 22 of the Acts of 2017
Section 1(3)
DE02.01 BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
JUDICIARY/MULTISERVICE CENTERS
(Baltimore County)
(E) New Catonsville District Court. Provide funds to continue
construction of a new district court/multiservice center
building in Catonsville and on–site parking garage, provided
that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue
on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary
to complete this project. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7)
OF THIS ACT, THIS AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT
TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2027 ...................................... 18,880,000
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
DW01.11 DIVISION OF HISTORICAL AND CULTURAL PROGRAMS
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland Historical Trust. Provide funds to be credited to the
Maryland Historical Trust Capital Grant Fund for historical
preservation and museum assistance. The funds appropriated
for this purpose shall be administered in accordance with §§
5A–328 and 5A–353 through 5A–359 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF
THIS ACT, THIS AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE
BEFORE JUNE 1, 2027 .............................................................. 600,000
– 124 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
(B) Maryland Historical Trust. Provide funds for the African
American Heritage Preservation Grant Program to assist in the
protection of properties with cultural and historic significance
to the African American community. The funds appropriated
for this purpose shall be administered in accordance with §
5A–330 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2027 .............................................................................................. 1,000,000
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB21 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, BALTIMORE
(Baltimore City)
(A) Central Electric Substation and Electrical Infrastructure
Upgrades. Provide funds to continue design of an electric
substation, recycling center, and electrical infrastructure
upgrades for the University of Maryland, Baltimore.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2027 ............................................................................................. 2,890,000
(B) Health Sciences Research Facility III and Surge Building.
Provide funds to complete construction and equipping of a new
research facility for the University of Maryland, Baltimore
School of Medicine ....................................................................... [3,600,000]
3,298,260
RB22 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, COLLEGE PARK
(Prince George’s County)
(A) A. James Clark Hall – New Bioengineering Building. Provide
funds to continue construction of and begin equipping new
bioengineering building, provided that notwithstanding Section
6 of this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this
project .......................................................................................... [25,452,000]
25,338,004
Chapter 22 of the Acts of 2017, as amended by Chapter
537 of the Acts of 2020, Chapter 344 of the Acts of 2022,
and Chapter 102 of the Acts of 2023
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
– 125 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2017 in the total principal amount of [$1,084,832,631]
$1,084,416,895. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 9 of the Acts of 2018
Section 1(3)
DE02.01 BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
STATE GOVERNMENT CENTER – ANNAPOLIS
(Anne Arundel County)
(B) Annapolis Post Office. Provide funds to complete planning,
construction, and equipping of renovations to the Annapolis
Post Office. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS
ACT, THIS AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE
BEFORE JUNE 1, 2027 ........................................................... 8,209,000
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
DW01.08 JEFFERSON PATTERSON PARK AND MUSEUM
(A) Patterson Center Renovations. Provide funds to continue
planning and begin construction and equipping renovations to
the Patterson Center at the Jefferson Patterson Park and
Museum, provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act,
work may commence on this project prior to the appropriation
of all funds necessary to complete this project.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2027 .............................................................................................. 3,887,000
DW01.11 DIVISION OF HISTORICAL AND CULTURAL PROGRAMS
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland Historical Trust. Provide funds for the African
American Heritage Preservation Grant Program to assist in the
protection of properties with cultural and historic significance
– 126 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
to the African American community. The funds appropriated
for this purpose shall be administered in accordance with §
5A–330 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2027 .............................................................................................. 1,000,000
(B) Maryland Historical Trust. Provide funds to be credited to the
Maryland Historical Trust Capital Grant Fund for historical
preservation and museum assistance. The funds appropriated
for this purpose shall be administered in accordance with §§
5A–328 and 5A–353 through 5A–359 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF
THIS ACT, THIS AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE
BEFORE JUNE 1, 2027 .............................................................. 600,000
Chapter 14 of the Acts of 2019
Section 1(3)
WA01 DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE
(B) New Cumberland Barrack and Garage. Provide funds to
construct and equip a new Cumberland Barrack and Garage,
provided that, notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work
may commence on this project prior to the appropriation of all
funds necessary to complete this project (Allegany County) ... [7,154,000]
6,800,199
Chapter 14 of the Acts of 2019, as amended by Chapter 537 of the Acts
of 2020 and Chapter 720 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2019 in the total principal amount of [$1,085,874,166]
$1,085,520,365. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 537 of the Acts of 2020
Section 1(3)
– 127 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES
QR02.02 MARYLAND CORRECTIONAL TRAINING CENTER
(Washington County)
(A) Housing Unit Windows and Steam Heating System. Provide
funds to complete construction of the replacement of windows
and heating systems for housing units at the Maryland
Correctional Training Center .................................................. [7,460,000]
3,025,107
RM00 MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore City)
(C) New Student Services Support Building. Provide funds to
complete construction and equipping of a new Student
Services Support Building to house student services
functions .................................................................................... [4,851,000]
3,851,000
WA01 DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE
(B) New Cumberland Barrack and Garage. Provide funds to
complete construction and equip a new Cumberland Barrack
and Garage (Allegany County) ................................................ [2,352,000]
1,865,764
ZA01 MARYLAND HOSPITAL ASSOCIATION
(A) Atlantic General Hospital. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of Atlantic General Hospital Corporation for the
design, construction, and equipping of a new ambulatory
surgery facility, subject to the requirement that the grantee
provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of
this Act (Worcester County) ..................................................... [800,000]
0
Chapter 537 of the Acts of 2020, as amended by Chapter 344 of the
Acts of 2022 and Chapter 720 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
– 128 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2020 in the total principal amount of [$1,087,177,584]
$1,080,456,455. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 63 of the Acts of 2021
Section 1(3)
DE02.01 BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
STATE GOVERNMENT CENTER – ANNAPOLIS
(Anne Arundel County)
(D) State House [Exterior and Grounds] AND OLD TREASURY
BUILDING Restoration. Provide funds to continue design and
begin construction of the restoration of AND IMPROVEMENTS
TO the exterior and grounds of the historic Maryland State
House and INTERIOR OF THE STATE HOUSE AND Old
Treasury buildings, INCLUDING THE OLD SENATE
CHAMBER, in the Annapolis State Government Complex ..... 2,750,000
Chapter 63 of the Acts of 2021, as amended by Chapter 344 of the Acts
of 2022 and Chapter 720 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2021 in the total principal amount of [$1,039,550,388]
$1,038,046,291. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE SERVICES
VE01 RESIDENTIAL SERVICES
– 129 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(B) Cheltenham Youth Treatment Center. Provide funds to
complete design and begin construction of a treatment center
for female and male youths at the Cheltenham campus,
provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may
commence on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds
necessary to complete this project (Prince George’s County) .... [1,506,768]
2,671
Chapter 344 of the Acts of 2022
Section 1(3)
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB30 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND GLOBAL CAMPUS
(Prince George’s County)
(A) Adelphi Building Renovation. Provide funds to design,
construct, and renovate the Adelphi Building for the University
of Maryland Global Campus ....................................................... [1,500,000]
1,073,662
Chapter 344 of the Acts of 2022, as amended by Chapter 102 of the
Acts of 2023 and Chapter 720 of the Acts of 2024
Section 1
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2022 in the total principal amount of [$1,179,688,000]
$1,179,261,662. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 102 of the Acts of 2023
Section 1(3)
DE02.01 BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
STATE GOVERNMENT CENTER – ANNAPOLIS
(Anne Arundel County)
(C) State House [Exterior and Grounds] AND OLD TREASURY
– 130 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
BUILDING Restoration. Provide funds to complete
construction of the restoration of AND IMPROVEMENTS TO
the exterior and grounds of the historic Maryland State House
and INTERIOR OF THE STATE HOUSE AND Old Treasury
buildings, INCLUDING THE OLD SENATE CHAMBER, in the
Annapolis State Government Complex ................................... [20,339,000]
18,339,000
ML10 CLIFTON T. PERKINS HOSPITAL CENTER
(Howard County)
(A) Clifton T. Perkins Hospital. Provide funds to complete design
and begin construction of renovations to the North Wing of
Clifton T. Perkins Hospital Center and an addition to the
hospital, provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act,
work may commence on this project prior to the appropriation
of all funds necessary to complete this project .......................... [21,676,000]
13,227,000
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB30 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND GLOBAL CAMPUS
(Prince George’s County)
(A) Adelphi Building Renovation. Provide funds to design,
construct, and renovate the Adelphi Building ........................... [650,000]
0
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(DN) Incubator Spaces – Cannabis. Provide funds to the Maryland
Economic Development Corporation for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
facilities to be used as incubator spaces in accordance with §
36–406 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article,
contingent on enactment of HB 556 or SB 516 (Statewide) ...... [2,000,000]
0
Chapter 102 of the Acts of 2023, as amended by Chapter 720 of the
Acts of 2024
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
– 131 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2023 in the total principal amount of [$1,196,702,609]
$1,180,603,609. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
Section 1(3)
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB24 TOWSON UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore County)
(A) New College of Health Professions Building. Provide funds to
complete construction and equipping of a new building for the
College of Health Professions and demolition of Linthicum
Hall, Glen Esk Counseling Center, and Dowell Health
Center ....................................................................................... [41,079,609]
38,079,609
Chapter 720 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2024 in the total principal amount of [$1,845,046,000]
$1,805,846,500. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
Section 1(3)
DE02.01 BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
STATE GOVERNMENT CENTER – BALTIMORE
(Baltimore City)
(F) William Donald Schaefer Tower Renovation. Provide funds to
complete design and begin construction of the renovation of
the William Donald Schaefer Tower, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may commence on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary
– 132 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
to complete this project ............................................................ [16,500,000]
0
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
MA01 OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY
(C) Federally Qualified Health Centers Grant Program. Provide
grants to acquire, design, construct, renovate, and equip
buildings to be used as Federally Qualified Health Centers
(Statewide) ................................................................................ [9,894,000]
6,994,000
ML10 CLIFTON T. PERKINS HOSPITAL CENTER
(Howard County)
(A) Renovation of Clifton T. Perkins Hospital North Wing. Provide
funds to continue construction and begin equipping of
renovations to the North Wing of Clifton T. Perkins Hospital
Center and an addition to the hospital, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project .................................................................. [16,051,000]
0
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB30 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND GLOBAL CAMPUS
(Prince George’s County)
(A) Adelphi Building Renovation. Provide funds to design,
construct, and renovate the Adelphi Building ........................... [1,248,500]
0
RM00 MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore City)
(B) Carter–Grant–Wilson Building Renovation. Provide funds to
complete design and begin construction and equipping of the
renovation of the Carter–Grant–Wilson building for the School
of Graduate Studies and the Division of International Affairs,
provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may
commence on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds
necessary to complete this project ............................................... [4,445,000]
1,945,000
– 133 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
declares that it is the public policy of this State to manage State general obligation bond
debt in a manner that will maintain Maryland’s AAA bond rating. The General Assembly
further declares that legislative oversight, control, and review of all forms of State
obligations are essential to maintenance of the State’s existing bond rating and protection
of the fiscal integrity of the State.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, before work may commence
pursuant to any supplement to any appropriation contained in this Act, satisfactory
evidence must be given to the Board of Public Works that the project can be completed with
the aggregate of the funds in this Act and previously appropriated for the stated purpose.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) with the approval of the Department of Budget and Management, any
appropriation for design provided in this Act may be used to fund construction if the amount
of the appropriation exceeds the amount required for design expenses, including allowances
for contingencies; and
(2) with the approval of the Department of Budget and Management, any
appropriation for construction provided in this Act may be used to purchase capital
equipment if the amount of the appropriation exceeds the amount required for construction
expenses, including allowances for contingencies.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as otherwise provided
in this Act, before a State agency or institution named in this Act as responsible for an
individual item may begin work with funds appropriated by this Act, the agency or
institution shall provide satisfactory evidence to the Board of Public Works that the work
described in the individual item can be completed with the funds specified for that item.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, with the approval of the
Department of Budget and Management, any appropriation under the provisions of this
Act that is in excess of the amount needed for a project may be credited to the Construction
Contingency Fund under § 3–609 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
Notwithstanding the fund balance restriction set forth in § 3–609(c) of the State Finance
and Procurement Article, any funds credited to the Fund may cause the total balance in
the Fund to exceed 1.25% of the capital debt affordability limit as determined under Title
8 of the State Finance and Procurement Article, in fiscal year 2026.
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if federal funds are available
to help accomplish any project identified in this Act, the State agency or institution
responsible for the project shall make efforts through proper administrative procedures to
obtain these federal funds. Before spending any funds appropriated by this Act, the agency
or institution shall certify its efforts to the Board of Public Works and state the reason for
any failure to obtain federal funds. If federal funds are obtained, they shall be used to defray
the costs of the project described in this Act and not to expand its scope.
– 134 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
SECTION 9. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) for any appropriation for the planning of a State–owned project provided in
this Act, if a program required by § 3–602(d) of the State Finance and Procurement Article
has not been submitted, the State agency or institution responsible for the project shall
submit a program to the Department of Budget and Management for approval before funds
may be expended from the appropriation; and
(2) for any appropriation for the construction of a State–owned project provided
in this Act, if preliminary plans and outline specifications required by § 3–602(f)(2)(i) of the
State Finance and Procurement Article have not been prepared, the State agency or
institution responsible for the project shall submit preliminary plans and outline
specifications to the Department of Budget and Management for approval before funds may
be expended from the appropriation.
SECTION 10. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That no portion of the proceeds of
a loan or any of the matching funds provided for a project funded under this Act may be
used for the furtherance of an essentially religious endeavor. Upon the request of the Board
of Public Works, a recipient of the proceeds of a loan under this Act shall submit evidence
satisfactory to the Board that none of the proceeds of the loan or any matching funds has
been or is being used for a purpose prohibited by this Act.
SECTION 11. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Comptroller may
advance funds to any loan funds account established pursuant to a general obligation bond
loan enabling Act for any expenditure authorized by that Act, provided that if general
obligation bonds have not been issued under the authority of that Act, the next ensuing
sale of general obligation bonds shall include the issuance of bonds under the authority of
that Act in an amount at least equivalent to the amount of the funds so advanced.
SECTION 12. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 13, 14, 15, and 16
of Chapter 720 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2024 be repealed.
SECTION 13. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan Preauthorization Act of 2026 in the total principal amount
of $665,908,000 $730,635,000 $814,135,000 $916,022,000, notwithstanding Section 13(3) of
this Act. These loans shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State general
obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and issued, sold,
and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the State Finance
and Procurement Article.
(2) The bonds to evidence these loans or installments of these loans may be sold
as a single issue or may be consolidated and sold as part of a single issue of bonds under §
– 135 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
8–122 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(3) The cash proceeds of the sale of the bonds shall be paid to the Treasurer and
first shall be applied to the payment of the expenses of issuing, selling, and delivering the
bonds, unless funds for this purpose are otherwise provided, and then shall be credited on
the books of the Comptroller and expended, on approval by the Board of Public Works, for
the following public purposes, including any applicable architects’ and engineers’ fees:
DE02.01 BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
JUDICIARY/MULTISERVICE CENTERS
(B) New Supreme Court of Maryland Building. Provide funds to
continue construction of a new Supreme Court of Maryland
Building in Annapolis, provided that notwithstanding Section 6
of this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this project.
Further provided that $17,030,000 is contingent upon
Maryland receiving a conditional federal award from the
Veterans Home Construction Grant program prior to June 1,
2026, and the fiscal 2026 authorization being used for the
design, construction, and equipping of the New State Veterans
Home in Sykesville (Anne Arundel County) ............................... 81,408,000
111,408,000
128,438,000
(C) Washington County District Court Renovation and Expansion.
Provide funds to complete construction of a renovation and an
addition to the existing Washington County District Court in
Hagerstown (Washington County) .............................................. 2,948,000
MILITARY DEPARTMENT
DH01.04 MILITARY DEPARTMENT OPERATIONS AND
MAINTENANCE
(Frederick County)
(A) Frederick Readiness Center Renovation and Expansion.
Provide funds to complete construction of the renovation and
expansion of the Frederick Readiness Center ............................ 2,678,000
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
KA05 CAPITAL GRANTS AND LOANS ADMINISTRATION
(Garrett County)
– 136 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
(A) Natural Resources Development Fund. Provide funds to
construct capital development projects on Department of
Natural Resources property in accordance with § 5–903(g) of
the Natural Resources Article, provided that notwithstanding
Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on this project prior to
the appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this
project .......................................................................................... 1,008,000
(1) Mt. Nebo Wildlife Management
Area – Natural Resource Police
New Office, Garage and Storage
Facility ............................................ 1,008,000
KA09.01 ENGINEERING AND CONSTRUCTION
(Somerset County)
(A) Waterway Improvement Fund. Provide funds to finance
projects which expand and improve recreational boating
throughout the State consistent with the State Boat Act. The
funds appropriated for this purpose shall be administered in
accordance with §§ 8–707 through 8–709 of the Natural
Resources Article .......................................................................... 8,727,000
(1) Somers Cove Marina – Bulkhead
Replacement and Facility
Improvements .................................. 8,727,000
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
MA01 OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY
(Statewide)
(A) Demolish Decommissioned Buildings. Provide funds to
complete the demolition of the Clifton T. Perkins Hospital
Center Dormitory Buildings 1 and 2 and continue the
demolition of the Regional Institute for Children and
Adolescents – Baltimore Old Dormitory Building provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project ................................................................... 1,882,000
ML10 CLIFTON T. PERKINS HOSPITAL CENTER
(Howard County)
(A) Renovation of Clifton T. Perkins Hospital North Wing. Provide
funds to continue construction of renovations to the North Wing
– 137 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
of Clifton T. Perkins Hospital Center and an addition to the
hospital provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act,
work may continue on this project prior to the appropriation of
all funds necessary to complete this project ................................ 27,071,000
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES
QR02.03 ROXBURY CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION
(Washington County)
(A) RCI Perimeter Fence System Replacement. Provide funds to
continue construction of the replacement perimeter fencing and
security systems at Roxbury Correctional Institution, provided
that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue
on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary
to complete this project ............................................................... 14,342,000
QT04 DIVISION OF PRETRIAL DETENTION
(Baltimore City)
(A) Baltimore Therapeutic Treatment Center. Provide funds to
continue construction of a therapeutic treatment and detention
center at the Baltimore City Correctional Complex, provided
that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue
on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary
to complete this project. Further provided that $45,857,000 is
contingent upon Maryland receiving a contingent federal award
from the Veterans Home Construction Grant Program prior to
June 1, 2026, and the fiscal 2026 authorization being used for
the design, construction, and equipping of the New State
Veterans Home in Sykesville ....................................................... 231,558,000
277,558,000
323,415,000
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB21 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, BALTIMORE CAMPUS
(Baltimore City)
(A) New Dental Ambulatory Surgery Center. Provide funds to
complete construction of an ambulatory surgery center ............ 862,000
(B) New School of Social Work Building. Provide funds to complete
construction of a new School of Social Work building ................ 39,430,000
– 138 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
RB22 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, COLLEGE PARK CAMPUS
(Prince George’s County)
(A) New Health and Human Sciences Complex. Provide funds to
continue the construction of the Health and Human Sciences
Complex for the School of Public Health and Academy for
Innovation and Entrepreneurship, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project .................................................................... 39,315,000
(B) New Interdisciplinary Engineering Building – Zupnik Hall.
Provide funds to complete construction of the interdisciplinary
engineering building ................................................................... 10,860,000
(C) Graduate Student Housing. Provide funds to acquire, design,
construct, and capital equip below–market–rate graduate
student housing at the University of Maryland, College Park
Campus and the City of College Park .......................................... 5,000,000
RB24 TOWSON UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore County)
(A) Smith Hall Renovation and Reconstruction. Provide funds to
complete construction of the partial demolition, renovation, and
reconstruction of Smith Hall for the College of Fine Arts and
Communication ............................................................................ 23,736,000
RB29 SALISBURY UNIVERSITY
(Wicomico County)
(A) Blackwell Hall Renovation. Provide funds to complete
construction of the renovation of Blackwell Hall to create a
Student Services Center .............................................................. 361,000
RB30 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND GLOBAL CAMPUS
(Prince George’s County)
(A) Global Campus Adelphi Administration Building Renovation.
Provide funds to begin design of the renovations to the Adelphi
Administration Building ............................................................. 3,200,000
RB31 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND BALTIMORE COUNTY
(Baltimore County)
(A) Sherman Hall Renovation. Provide funds to complete
– 139 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
construction of the renovation of Sherman Hall ......................... 9,087,000
(B) New Student Services Building. Provide funds to design a new
Student Services Building ............................................................ 6,000,000
RB36 UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND OFFICE
(Baltimore City)
(A) Rita Colwell Center Deferred Maintenance. Provide funds to
continue construction of deferred maintenance improvements,
including roof replacement and central plant upgrades, at the
Rita Colwell Center in Baltimore City, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project ................................................................... 2,906,000
RC00 BALTIMORE CITY COMMUNITY COLLEGE
(Baltimore City)
(A) Acquisition of Unidentified Properties. Provide funds to acquire
property adjacent to the Liberty Heights campus and to design
and construct site improvements .................................................. 9,000,000
RE01 MARYLAND SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
(Frederick County)
(A) New Student Residences. Provide funds to continue
construction of a new high school boys’ residence and student
center, high school girls’ residence, flexible residence, satellite
health center, and central offices at the Maryland School for
the Deaf in Frederick, provided that notwithstanding Section 6
of this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this project .... 9,224,000
RI00 MARYLAND HIGHER EDUCATION COMMISSION
(A) Community College Construction Grant Program. Provide
funds to assist the subdivisions in the acquisition of property
and in the design, construction, renovation, and equipping of
local and regional community college buildings, site
improvements, and facilities. The funds appropriated for this
purpose shall be administered in accordance with § 11–105(j)
of the Education Article, provided that notwithstanding Section
6 of this Act, work may continue on each of these projects prior
to the appropriation of all funds necessary to complete the
project .......................................................................................... 35,502,000
– 140 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
(1) Community College of Baltimore
County – Catonsville – Student
Services Center Renovation and
Expansion (Baltimore County) ....... 7,589,000
(2) Community College of Baltimore
County – Essex – Primary
Switchgear and Distribution
Replacement (Baltimore County) ... 2,116,000
(3) Hagerstown Community College –
Advanced Technology Center
Renovation (Washington County) .. 2,081,000
(4) Montgomery College – New
Germantown Student Services
Center (Montgomery County) ......... 19,139,000
(5) Montgomery College – Rockville –
Library Renovation (Montgomery
County) ............................................ 4,577,000
RM00 MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore City)
(A) Campuswide Electric Infrastructure Upgrades. Provide funds
to continue construction of a new electric substation and
electrical infrastructure upgrades, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project .................................................................... 40,500,000
(B) New Science Center, Phase II. Provide funds to continue
construction of the New Science Center, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project .................................................................... 76,797,000
UB00 MARYLAND ENVIRONMENTAL SERVICE
(St. Mary’s County)
(A) State Water and Sewer Infrastructure Improvement Fund.
Provide funds to design, construct, and equip capital
improvements for State institutions. Expenditures for the
following project may not exceed the amount listed below by
– 141 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
more than 7.5% without notification to the General Assembly.
Funds may only be spent on the project listed below or on prior
or future authorized projects. Expenditure of any part of this
appropriation for a prior or future authorized project shall also
require notification to the General Assembly ............................. 2,276,000
(1) Charlotte Hall Veterans Home –
Water Treatment Plant Upgrade ... 2,276,000
WA01 DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE
(A) Barrack J – Annapolis: Communications Room and New
Garage. Provide funds to complete construction of a new garage
and the renovation of Barrack J in Annapolis for a new
communications room (Anne Arundel County) ........................... 3,326,000
(B) Barrack L – Forestville: New Barrack and Garage. Provide
funds to complete construction of a replacement barrack and
garage in Forestville (Prince George’s County) ........................... 8,831,000
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(A) Luminis Health Doctors Community Medical Center – New
Obstetrical Care Tower. Provide a grant to the Luminis Health
Doctors Community Medical Center, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements to the Luminis Health Doctors
Community Medical Center, including a new tower for
obstetrical care (Prince George’s County) .................................. 10,000,000
(B) Westminster Fiber Project. Provide a grant to the Mayor and
City Council of Westminster for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Westminster fiber optic network project (Carroll County) ........... 1,000,000
(C) Maryland Center for History and Culture – Enoch Pratt House
and Collections Storage Renovation. Provide a grant to the
Maryland Center for History and Culture for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Enoch Pratt House and Library Collections Storage (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................... 2,500,000
(D) St. Agnes Healthcare. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
– 142 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
of St. Agnes Healthcare, Inc. to assist in the design,
construction, renovation, and equipping of the Family Birthing
Center (Baltimore City) ................................................................ 1,000,000
(E) Ellicott City North Tunnel Extension Project. Provide a grant to
the County Executive and County Council of Howard County for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Ellicott City North Tunnel Extension
project (Howard County) .............................................................. 10,000,000
(F) The Johns Hopkins Hospital. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of The Johns Hopkins Hospital to assist in the design,
construction, expansion, renovation, and equipping of the
Pediatric Emergency Department Psychiatric Unit (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................... 650,000
(G) Catholic Charities – Intergenerational Center. Provide a grant
to the Board of Directors of the Associated Catholic Charities for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Catholic Charities Intergenerational
Center (Baltimore City) ................................................................ 2,000,000
(H) Damascus Main Street. Provide a grant to Montgomery County,
Maryland for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of infrastructure improvements to Main
Street, Damascus (Montgomery County) ..................................... 250,000
(I) B & O Railroad Museum. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the B & O Railroad Museum for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements to the B & O Railroad Museum
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ 3,000,000
(J) Glen Echo Park Spanish Ballroom Renovation. Provide a grant
to the County Executive and County Council of Montgomery
County for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the historic Glen Echo Park Spanish
Ballroom (Montgomery County) ................................................... 1,500,000
(K) MedStar Franklin Square Hospital Capital Improvements.
Provide a grant to the Board Trustees of Franklin Square
– 143 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Hospital Center, Inc. d.b.a. MedStar Franklin for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of systemwide infrastructure improvements
(Baltimore County) ....................................................................... 1,000,000
0
(L) MD 32 Noise Mitigation for Fox Valley Estates. Provide a grant
to the Fox Valley Estates Homeowners Association for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the MD 32 Noise Mitigation for Fox Valley Estates
project (Howard County) .............................................................. 1,800,000
(M) Young Artists of America. Provide a grant to Young Artists of
America, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Young Artists of
America project (Montgomery County) ........................................ 1,500,000
(N) Springsong Museum. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of the Rachel Carson Place of Wonder Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Springsong Museum (Montgomery County) ................................ 1,000,000
(O) Pikesville Armory Foundation – Pikesville Armory Renovation.
Provide a grant to the governing board of the Pikesville Armory
Foundation, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Pikesville Armory
(Baltimore County) ....................................................................... 3,000,000
(P) Bowie Mill Bike Trail. Provide a grant to the County Executive
and County Council of Montgomery County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Bowie Mill bike trail (Montgomery County) ................................ 2,100,000
(Q) MedStar Southern Maryland Hospital. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of MedStar Southern Maryland Hospital
Center, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of infrastructure improvements to
MedStar Southern Maryland Hospital (Prince George’s
County) .......................................................................................... 10,000,000
– 144 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
(R) Baltimore Symphony Orchestra. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of the Baltimore Symphony Orchestra Endowment
Trust for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Joseph Meyerhoff Symphony Hall
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 1,500,000
(S) Southern Bridge Career and Education Center. Provide a grant
to the Board of Directors of the Mary Harvin Transformation
Center Development Corporation, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Southern Bridge Career and Education Center (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................... 2,500,000
(T) Kent County Public Schools. Provide a grant to Kent County,
Maryland to fund the design, construction, and capital
equipping of public school buildings and public school capital
improvements (Kent County) ........................................................ 4,000,000
ZA01 MARYLAND HOSPITAL ASSOCIATION
(A) Maryland Hospital Association. Provide funds for Maryland
Hospital Association grants (Statewide) ...................................... 20,000,000
SECTION 14. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan Preauthorization Act of 2027 in the total principal amount
of $475,359,000 $479,359,000. These loans shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and
delivery of State general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public
Works and issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and
8–131.2 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The bonds to evidence these loans or installments of these loans may be sold
as a single issue or may be consolidated and sold as part of a single issue of bonds under §
8–122 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(3) The cash proceeds of the sale of the bonds shall be paid to the Treasurer and
first shall be applied to the payment of the expenses of issuing, selling, and delivering the
bonds, unless funds for this purpose are otherwise provided, and then shall be credited on
the books of the Comptroller and expended, on approval by the Board of Public Works, for
the following public purposes, including any applicable architects’ and engineers’ fees:
– 145 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
DE02.01 BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
JUDICIARY/MULTISERVICE CENTERS
(Anne Arundel County)
(B) New Supreme Court of Maryland Building. Provide funds to
complete construction of a new Supreme Court of Maryland
Building in Annapolis .................................................................. 25,408,000
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
MA01 OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY
(Statewide)
(A) Demolish Decommissioned Buildings. Provide funds to
complete the demolition of the Clifton T. Perkins Hospital
Center Dormitory Buildings 1 and 2 and the Regional
Institute for Children and Adolescents – Baltimore Old
Dormitory Building ..................................................................
187,000
ML10 CLIFTON T. PERKINS HOSPITAL CENTER
(Howard County)
(A) Renovation of Clifton T. Perkins Hospital North Wing. Provide
funds to complete construction of renovations to the North
Wing of Clifton T. Perkins Hospital Center and an addition to
the hospital ................................................................................. 16,032,000
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES
QR02.03 ROXBURY CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION
(Washington County)
(A) RCI Perimeter Fence System Replacement. Provide funds to
complete construction of the replacement perimeter fencing
and security systems at Roxbury Correctional Institution ........ 7,171,000
QT04 DIVISION OF PRETRIAL DETENTION
(Baltimore City)
(A) Baltimore Therapeutic Treatment Center. Provide funds to
continue construction of a therapeutic treatment and detention
center at the Baltimore City Correctional Complex, provided
that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue
on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary
– 146 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
to complete this project ............................................................... 238,023,000
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB21 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, BALTIMORE CAMPUS
(Baltimore City)
(A) Central Electric Substation and Electrical Infrastructure
Upgrades. Provide funds to complete construction of an electric
substation and electrical infrastructure upgrades ..................... 1,523,000
RB22 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, COLLEGE PARK CAMPUS
(Prince George’s County)
(A) New Health and Human Sciences Complex. Provide funds to
continue the construction of the Health and Human Sciences
Complex for the School of Public Health and Academy for
Innovation and Entrepreneurship, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project .................................................................... 44,325,000
RB36 UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND OFFICE
(Baltimore City)
(A) Rita Colwell Center Deferred Maintenance. Provide funds to
complete construction of deferred maintenance improvements,
including central plant upgrades, at the Rita Colwell Center in
Baltimore City .............................................................................. 4,820,000
RE01 MARYLAND SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
(Frederick County)
(A) New Student Residences. Provide funds to continue
construction of a new high school boys’ residence and student
center, high school girls’ residence, flexible residence, satellite
health center, and central offices at the Maryland School for
the Deaf in Frederick, provided that notwithstanding Section 6
of this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this
project ........................................................................................... 16,731,000
RI00 MARYLAND HIGHER EDUCATION COMMISSION
(A) Community College Construction Grant Program. Provide
funds to assist the subdivisions in the acquisition of property
– 147 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
and in the design, construction, renovation, and equipping of
local and regional community college buildings, site
improvements, and facilities. The funds appropriated for this
purpose shall be administered in accordance with § 11–105(j)
of the Education Article, provided that notwithstanding Section
6 of this Act, work may continue on each of these projects prior
to the appropriation of all funds necessary to complete the
project .......................................................................................... 21,842,000
(1) Community College of Baltimore
County – Essex – Primary
Switchgear and Distribution
Replacement (Baltimore County) 2,703,000
(2) Montgomery College – New
Germantown Student Services
Center (Montgomery County) 19,139,000
RM00 MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore City)
(A) Campuswide Electric Infrastructure Upgrades. Provide funds
to continue construction of a new electric substation and
electrical infrastructure upgrades, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project ................................................................... 22,500,000
(B) New Science Center, Phase II. Provide funds to continue
construction of the New Science Center, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project .................................................................... 76,797,000
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(A) Kent County Public Schools. Provide a grant to Kent County,
Maryland to fund the design, construction, and capital
equipping of public school buildings and public school capital
improvements (Kent County) ........................................................ 4,000,000
SECTION 15. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan Preauthorization Act of 2028 in the total principal amount
– 148 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
of $336,550,000. These loans shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The bonds to evidence these loans or installments of these loans may be sold
as a single issue or may be consolidated and sold as part of a single issue of bonds under §
8–122 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(3) The cash proceeds of the sale of the bonds shall be paid to the Treasurer and
first shall be applied to the payment of the expenses of issuing, selling, and delivering the
bonds, unless funds for this purpose are otherwise provided, and then shall be credited on
the books of the Comptroller and expended, on approval by the Board of Public Works, for
the following public purposes, including any applicable architects’ and engineers’ fees:
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES
QT04 DIVISION OF PRETRIAL DETENTION
(Baltimore City)
(A) Baltimore Therapeutic Treatment Center. Provide funds to
continue construction of a therapeutic treatment and detention
center at the Baltimore City Correctional Complex, provided
that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue
on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary
to complete this project ............................................................... 252,510,000
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB22 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, COLLEGE PARK CAMPUS
(Prince George’s County)
(A) New Health and Human Sciences Complex. Provide funds to
complete the construction of the Health and Human Sciences
Complex for the School of Public Health and Academy for
Innovation and Entrepreneurship .............................................. 11,081,000
RE01 MARYLAND SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
(Frederick County)
(A) New Student Residences. Provide funds to continue
construction of a new high school boys’ residence and student
center, high school girls’ residence, flexible residence, satellite
health center, and central offices at the Maryland School for
the Deaf in Frederick, provided that notwithstanding Section 6
– 149 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
of this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this
project ........................................................................................... 10,407,000
RI00 MARYLAND HIGHER EDUCATION COMMISSION
(A) Community College Construction Grant Program. Provide
funds to assist the subdivisions in the acquisition of property
and in the design, construction, renovation, and equipping of
local and regional community college buildings, site
improvements, and facilities. The funds appropriated for this
purpose shall be administered in accordance with § 11–105(j)
of the Education Article ............................................................... 9,254,000
(1) Community College of Baltimore
County – Essex – Primary
Switchgear and Distribution
Replacement (Baltimore County) 451,000
(2) Montgomery College – New
Germantown Student Services
Center (Montgomery County) 8,803,000
RM00 MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore City)
(A) Campuswide Electric Infrastructure Upgrades. Provide funds
to complete construction of a new electric substation and
electrical infrastructure upgrades .............................................. 8,500,000
(B) New Science Center, Phase II. Provide funds to complete
construction of the New Science Center ..................................... 44,798,000
SECTION 16. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan Preauthorization Act of 2029 in the total principal amount
of $54,592,000. These loans shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The bonds to evidence these loans or installments of these loans may be sold
as a single issue or may be consolidated and sold as part of a single issue of bonds under §
8–122 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
– 150 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
(3) The cash proceeds of the sale of the bonds shall be paid to the Treasurer and
first shall be applied to the payment of the expenses of issuing, selling, and delivering the
bonds, unless funds for this purpose are otherwise provided, and then shall be credited on
the books of the Comptroller and expended, on approval by the Board of Public Works, for
the following public purposes, including any applicable architects’ and engineers’ fees:
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES
QT04 DIVISION OF PRETRIAL DETENTION
(Baltimore City)
(A) Baltimore Therapeutic Treatment Center. Provide funds to
complete construction of a therapeutic treatment and detention
center at the Baltimore City Correctional Complex .................. 40,116,000
RE01 MARYLAND SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
(Frederick County)
(A) New Student Residences. Provide funds to complete
construction of a new high school boys’ residence and student
center, high school girls’ residence, flexible residence, satellite
health center, and central offices at the Maryland School for
the Deaf in Frederick ................................................................... 14,476,000
SECTION 17. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the net new debt to be
authorized by this Act may not exceed $1,750,000,000 $1,698,500,000 $1,749,107,177
$1,750,000,000 as evidenced by the following:
Debt to be authorized by this Act ...................................... 1,814,825,000
1,763,325,000
1,813,932,177
1,814,825,000
Subtotal .............................................................................. 1,814,825,000
1,763,325,000
1,813,932,177
1,814,825,000
Reductions in previously authorized State Debt made in this
bill ........................................................................................ 64,825,000
New debt to be authorized by this Act ............................... 1,750,000,000
1,698,500,000
1,749,107,177
– 151 –

Ch. 603 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1,750,000,000
Bond premium proceeds authorized by this Act ................... 140,134,000
Total authorizations and bond premium proceeds authorized
by this Act .......................................................................... 1,954,959,000
1,903,459,000
1,954,066,177
1,954,959,000
SECTION 18. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Board of Public Works
may approve contracts and otherwise obligate funds authorized in this Act upon the
effective date of the relevant section of this Act.
SECTION 19. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Education
5–308.
(c) (1) A county government is not required to reimburse the State for
outstanding debt service for a school building that is transferred to the county government
in accordance with subsection (b) of this section until [2] 5 years after the school building is
transferred.
(2) After the [2–year] 5–YEAR period in paragraph (1) of this subsection
ends, the county government shall reimburse the State for outstanding debt service for a
school building in the amount that the county government would have been required to pay
when the school building was transferred to the county.
SECTION 19. 20. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 13 of this Act
shall take effect June 1, 2026.
SECTION 20. 21. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 14 of this Act
shall take effect June 1, 2027.
SECTION 21. 22. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 15 of this Act
shall take effect June 1, 2028.
SECTION 22. 23. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 16 of this Act
shall take effect June 1, 2029.
SECTION 23. 24. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Sections 19, 20, 21, and 22 20, 21, 22, and 23 of this Act, this Act shall take effect June 1,
2025.
– 152 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 603
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 153 –